Excitatory amino acids in the developing brain: ontogeny, plasticity, and excitotoxicity.
Periventricular hyperintensity detected by magnetic resonance imaging in infancy.
Anencephaly: clinical determination of brain death and neuropathologic studies.
ACTH therapy in infantile spasms: relationship between dose of ACTH and initial effect or long-term prognosis.
Gross motor patterns in children with cerebral palsy and spastic diplegia.
Mistaken diagnoses in continuous muscle fiber activity of peripheral nerve origin.
Haemophilus influenzae meningitis with prolonged hospital course.
EEG correlation of improvement in hemolytic-uremic syndrome after plasma infusion.
Reversible myopathy due to labetalol.
Multiple intracranial mucoceles associated with phaeohyphomycosis of the paranasal sinuses.
Hyponatraemia secondary to an inappropriately high release of antidiuretic hormone in cardiac tamponade.
Threat of unemployment and cardiovascular risk factors: longitudinal study of quality of sleep and serum cholesterol concentrations in men threatened with redundancy.
Permanent external striated sphincter stents in patients with spinal injuries.
Hypercalcemia in infants presenting with apnea.
Primary leptomeningeal B-cell lymphoma in a 8-year-old child.
Epidural morphine for analgesia after caesarean section: a report of 4880 patients
Ethyl chloride and venepuncture pain: a comparison with intradermal lidocaine.
Brain protection: physiological and pharmacological considerations. Part I: The physiology of brain injury.
Transoesophageal pacing for perioperative control of neonatal paroxysmal supraventricular tachycardia.
Hospital admissions from the Surgical Day Care Centre of Vancouver General Hospital 1977-1987.
Two siblings with phenotypes mimicking peroxisomal disorders but with discordant biochemical findings.
The Exeter Dysphagia Assessment Technique.
Transient neuromuscular impairment resulting from prolonged inhalation of halothane and enflurane.
Resolution of the adult respiratory distress syndrome following colectomy and liver transplantation.
Barrett's esophagus in children and young adults. Frequent association with mental retardation.
Scintigraphic measurement of oropharyngeal transit in man.
Irritable bowel syndrome in women having diagnostic laparoscopy or hysterectomy. Relation to gynecologic features and outcome.
Myasthenia gravis.
Anorectal function in incontinent patients with cerebrospinal disease.
Dementia, depression, or grief? The differential diagnosis.
Semantic deterioration in Alzheimer's: the patterns to expect.
The auditory P300 event-related potential: an objective marker of the encephalopathy of chronic liver disease.
Increased serotoninergic and noradrenergic activity in hepatic encephalopathy in rats with thioacetamide-induced acute liver failure.
Pain experiences of intensive care unit patients.
Fungal pseudomeningitis superimposed on Escherichia coli meningitis.
Evaluating oxygen delivery and oxygen utilization with mixed venous oxygen saturation monitoring: a case study approach.
The effect of improved cementing techniques on component loosening in total hip replacement. An 11-year radiographic review.
Chiari pelvic osteotomy for osteoarthritis. The influence of the torn and detached acetabular labrum.
The Hastings bipolar hemiarthroplasty for subcapital fractures of the femoral neck. A 10-year prospective study.
Reduction of post-traumatic swelling and compartment pressure by impulse compression of the foot.
The management of the painful first metatarsophalangeal joint in the older patient. Arthrodesis or Keller's arthroplasty?
The modified Schollner costoplasty.
A surgical approach to the cervicothoracic spine.
Operative and conservative treatment of moderate spondylolisthesis in young patients.
Combined epidural and general anesthesia in aortic surgery.
Unusual haemostasis for an unusual tumour. Catastrophic bleeding from a tactile neurofibroma affecting the thoracic vertebrae. Case report.
Deletion of Alu sequences in the fifth c-sis intron in individuals with meningiomas.
Cheilitis granulomatosa: report of six cases and review of the literature.
The relationship of pemphigus to neoplasia.
Prevalence and characteristics of multiple analgesic drug use in an elderly study group.
Pelvic pain: lessons from anatomy and physiology.
Treatment of phenobarbital poisoning with multiple dose activated charcoal in an infant.
Headache: a marker of depression
Botulinum toxin treatment of cranial-cervical dystonia, spasmodic dysphonia, other focal dystonias and hemifacial spasm.
Botulinum toxin treatment in spasmodic torticollis.
Central nervous system haemangioblastoma: a clinical and genetic study of 52 cases.
Vesicular changes in the myopathies of AIDS. Ultrastructural observations and their relationship to zidovudine treatment.
The relationship of antibody levels to the clinical spectrum of human neurocysticercosis.
Low plasma iron status and akathisia.
Extradural implantation of sacral anterior root stimulators.
Bimanual simultaneous motor performance and impaired ability to shift attention in Parkinson's disease.
The treatment of Gilles de la Tourette syndrome by limbic leucotomy.
Stiffman syndrome: a rare paraneoplastic disorder?
LDH isoenzymes in cerebrospinal fluid in various brain tumours.
Misperceptions of comprehension difficulties of stroke patients by doctors, nurses and relatives.
Practice effects on the preprogramming of discrete movements in Parkinson's disease.
Blood pressure reactivity predicts myocardial infarction among treated hypertensive patients.
The relationship of headache symptoms with severity and duration of attacks.
Surgical management of exophytic chiasmatic-hypothalamic tumors of childhood.
Long-term follow-up review of 31 children with severe closed head trauma.
Initial CT findings in 753 patients with severe head injury. A report from the NIH Traumatic Coma Data Bank.
Neurobehavioral outcome 1 year after severe head injury. Experience of the Traumatic Coma Data Bank.
Meningiomas mimicking cerebral schwannoma.
Use of CT and MR imaging to distinguish intracranial lesions and to define the need for biopsy in AIDS patients
Hormonal dependency of cerebral meningiomas. Part 1: Female sex steroid receptors and their significance as specific markers for adjuvant medical therapy.
Hormonal dependency of cerebral meningiomas. Part 2: In vitro effect of steroids, bromocriptine, and epidermal growth factor on growth of meningiomas.
Intracarotid hydroxyethyl methacrylate solution causing stroke in dogs.
Hemiparkinsonism as a complication of an Ommaya reservoir. Case report.
Fourth ventricular schwannoma. Case report.
Myxomatous cyst of the brachial plexus. Case report.
Postlaminectomy ossified extradural pseudocyst. Case report.
Intradural epithelial cyst at the craniovertebral junction. Case report.
Stereotactic investigation of limbic epilepsy using a multimodal image analysis system. Technical note.
Disturbances in the cerebral perfusion of human immune deficiency virus-1 seropositive asymptomatic subjects: a quantitative tomography study of 18 cases.
HMPAO-SPECT imaging resembling Alzheimer-type dementia in mitochondrial encephalomyopathy with lactic acidosis and stroke-like episodes (MELAS).
An evaluation of sensory changes and pain relief in trigeminal neuralgia following intracranial microvascular decompression and/or trigeminal glycerol rhizotomy.
Assessment of Proplast-Teflon disc replacements [published erratum appears in J Oral Maxillofac Surg 1991 Feb;49(2):220]
Normalization of plasma arginine vasopressin concentrations when children with meningitis are given maintenance plus replacement fluid therapy
Diagnosis of cerebrovascular disease in sickle cell anemia by magnetic resonance angiography
Assessing clinical significance of apnea exceeding fifteen seconds with event recording.
Measurement of progressive cerebral ventriculomegaly in infants after grades III and IV intraventricular hemorrhages.
Dysmorphogenesis elicited by microinjected acetaminophen analogs and metabolites in rat embryos cultured in vitro.
Importance of a neurologic evaluation in women with lower urinary tract dysfunction.
A practical approach to the painful bladder syndrome.
Rheumatoid arthritis and comorbidity.
An unusual manifestation of Paget's disease of bone: spinal epidural hematoma presenting as acute cauda equina syndrome.
Acute central nervous system symptoms caused by ibuprofen in connective tissue disease.
Recurrent thoracic outlet syndrome.
The influence of neutralizing heparin after carotid endarterectomy on postoperative stroke and wound hematoma.
Duplex scanning of normal or minimally diseased carotid arteries: correlation with arteriography and clinical outcome.
Changes in quality of care for five diseases measured by implicit review, 1981 to 1986
Prospective payment system and impairment at discharge. The 'quicker-and-sicker' story revisited
Acute sensorineural deafness in Lassa fever
Transcranial Doppler ultrasonography: clinical applications in cerebrovascular disease.
Arterial responses during migraine headache.
Evoked potentials in assessment and follow-up of patients with Wilson's disease.
Neurological sequelae of cerebral malaria in children.
Effects of uvulopalatopharyngoplasty on sleep architecture and patterns of obstructed breathing.
Mitochondrial encephalomyopathies.
Peroxisomal disorders.
The molecular biology of occlusive stroke in childhood.
Bacterial meningitis: an update.
The classification of childhood seizures and epilepsy syndromes.
Infantile spasms.
Status epilepticus in infancy and childhood.
Rett syndrome and the autistic disorders.
Tourette syndrome: recent advances.
The floppy infant: recent advances in the understanding of disorders affecting the neuromuscular junction.
Rehabilitation of the pediatric patient with a neuromuscular disease.
Magnetic resonance in pediatric and adolescent neuroimaging.
The use of ultrasound in evaluating neurologic diseases of childhood.
Coffee, caffeine, and cardiovascular disease in men
Dwarf locus mutants lacking three pituitary cell types result from mutations in the POU-domain gene pit-1.
Pre-trigeminal neuralgia.
Hemiplegia in posterior cerebral artery occlusion.
Capsular genu syndrome.
Tonic contraversive ocular tilt reaction due to unilateral meso-diencephalic lesion.
Acute naming deficits following dominant temporal lobectomy: prediction by age at 1st risk for seizures.
An estimate of the incidence of dementia in idiopathic Parkinson's disease.
Antemortem diagnosis of diffuse Lewy body disease.
Variable expression of Parkinson's disease: a base-line analysis of the DATATOP cohort. The Parkinson Study Group.
Chinese-white differences in the distribution of occlusive cerebrovascular disease.
Abnormal pulsatile secretion of luteinizing hormone in men with epilepsy: relationship to laterality and nature of paroxysmal discharges.
Dystonia in Parkinson's disease, multiple system atrophy, and progressive supranuclear palsy.
Neuroexcitatory plasma amino acids are elevated in migraine.
Borderzone hemodynamics in cerebrovascular disease.
Fresnel prisms improve visual perception in stroke patients with homonymous hemianopia or unilateral visual neglect.
Comparison of algorithms of testing for use in automated evaluation of sensation.
Gadolinium-MRI in acute transverse myelopathy.
Right-left disorientation in dementia of the Alzheimer type.
Effect of plasmapheresis on serum and CSF autoantibody levels in CNS paraneoplastic syndromes.
Aggravation of human and experimental myasthenia gravis by contrast media.
Dopamine beta-hydroxylase activity in cerebrospinal fluid of idiopathic torsion dystonia.
Inconsistent response to divalproex sodium in hemichorea/hemiballism.
Oxidation reactions in Parkinson's disease.
The modified superior based pharyngeal flap. Part III. A retrospective study.
A unique indexing splint for use in combined Le Fort and nasal injuries to avoid tracheostomy.
Patient compliance--a factor in facial trauma repair.
Febrile status epilepticus
Bacterial or viral meningitis? Measuring lactate in CSF can help you know quickly.
Understanding dizziness. How to decipher this nonspecific symptom.
Levels of mRNA for a putative kainate receptor are affected by seizures.
Immunodominant regions for T helper-cell sensitization on the human nicotinic receptor alpha subunit in myasthenia gravis.
Concurrent and construct validity of the Pediatric Evaluation of Disability Inventory.
Effects of neuro-developmental treatment and orthoses on knee flexion during gait: a single-subject design.
Conditioning of the spinal stretch reflex: implications for rehabilitation.
A clinicopathological study of the paraneoplastic neuromuscular syndromes associated with lung cancer.
Wilson's disease: 35 years' experience.
Progression of diabetic autonomic neuropathy over a decade in insulin-dependent diabetics.
Hyponatraemia in patients with cirrhosis.
Temporal bone: three-dimensional CT. Part II. Pathologic alterations.
Extrageniculate vision in hemianopic humans: saccade inhibition by signals in the blind field.
Dementia: what to do.
Hematoma of the optic nerve sheath after penetrating trauma.
Relationship between duration of spinal cord ischemia and postoperative neurologic deficits in animals.
Histopathologic correlation of magnetic resonance imaging signal patterns in a spinal cord injury model.
Cerebral cysticercosis.
Intractable complex partial seizures associated with occult temporal lobe encephalocele and meningoangiomatosis: a case report.
Cavernous-carotid thrombosis and ocular motor paresis
Value of magnetic resonance imaging in spontaneous extradural spinal hematoma due to vascular malformation: case report.
Naloxone and spinal fluid drainage as adjuncts in the surgical treatment of thoracoabdominal and thoracic aneurysms.
Stroke and its modification in Parkinson's disease.
Acute and long-term changes in serum lipids after acute stroke.
Risk factors for white matter changes detected by magnetic resonance imaging in the elderly.
Evidence for platelet-activating factor as a novel mediator in experimental stroke in rabbits.
Beneficial effect of 1,3-butanediol on cerebral energy metabolism and edema following brain embolization in rats.
Retinal infarction during sleep and wakefulness.
Etiologic importance of the intimal flap of the external carotid artery in the development of postcarotid endarterectomy stroke.
Transitional cell carcinomatous meningitis after M-VAC (methotrexate, vinblastine, doxorubicin, and cisplatin) chemotherapy.
Neurologic complications of cardiac transplantation.
Tryptophan-induced eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome
Does paramedic-base hospital contact result in beneficial deviations from standard prehospital protocols?
Analysis of programmed stimulation methods in the evaluation of ventricular arrhythmias in patients 20 years old and younger.
Aortic calcified plaques and cardiovascular disease (the Framingham Study).
Atlanto-occipital disarticulation. Accident characteristics.
Accidental death from a black-powder rifle breech plug.
Frequency of three Hex A mutant alleles among Jewish and non-Jewish carriers identified in a Tay-Sachs screening program.
More than one mutant allele causes infantile Tay-Sachs disease in French-Canadians.
Laparoscopic ventrosuspensions. A review of 72 cases.
Magnetic resonance imaging of radiation optic neuropathy.
Auditory hallucinations and smaller superior temporal gyral volume in schizophrenia.
A discriminant validity study of negative symptoms with a special focus on depression and antipsychotic medication.
Depression in dementia of the Alzheimer type and in multi-infarct dementia.
Panic disorder and cardiovascular/cerebrovascular problems: results from a community survey.
Nitrous oxide does not alter infarct volume in rats undergoing reversible middle cerebral artery occlusion.
Resistance to d-tubocurarine in lower motor neuron injury is related to increased acetylcholine receptors at the neuromuscular junction
A comparative trial of three agents in the treatment of acute migraine headache.
A prospective, double-blind study of metoclopramide hydrochloride for the control of migraine in the emergency department
Brain water content, brain blood volume, blood chemistry, and pathology in a model of cerebral edema.
Spectral electroretinography in thioridazine toxicity.
A case of unilateral posterior ischemic optic neuropathy after radical neck dissection.
Auditory brain stem implant: effect of tumor size and preoperative hearing level on function.
Cholinergic deficiency and frontal dysfunction in Parkinson's disease.
Posthypoxic glucose supplement reduces hypoxic-ischemic brain damage in the neonatal rat.
Relation of hyperglycemia early in ischemic brain infarction to cerebral anatomy, metabolism, and clinical outcome.
A clinical triad to diagnose paraneoplastic retinopathy.
Soluble interleukin-2 receptors in cerebrospinal fluid from individuals with various neurological disorders.
Ubiquitin immunoreactivity in kuru plaques in Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease.
Middle cerebral artery strokes causing homonymous hemianopia: positron emission tomography.
Vasoactive peptide release in the extracerebral circulation of humans during migraine headache.
Richner-Hanhart's syndrome. Electron microscopic study of the skin lesion.
Magnetic resonance imaging in neurological disorders.
Slow release carbamazepine in treatment of poorly controlled seizures.
The iris in Williams syndrome.
Analysis of prognostic factors and clinicopathological staging of thymoma
Intraoperative ultrasonic imaging of the ascending aorta in ischemic heart disease.
Prevention of paraplegia during aortic operations.
Diagnostic imaging and surgical treatment of dumbbell tumors of the mediastinum.
Coexisting thymic carcinoid tumor and thymoma.
Electroencephalography should not be routine in the evaluation of syncope in adults
The influence of age vs peak serum concentration on life-threatening events after chronic theophylline intoxication.
Morbidity, mortality, and quality of life for patients treated with levothyroxine
An immunofluorescence study of cerebral malaria. A correlation with histopathology.
Physiologic responses to prolonged electrically stimulated leg-cycle exercise in the spinal cord injured.
Rehabilitation of chronic stroke patients: changes in functional performance.
Manual stretch: effect on finger movement control and force control in stroke subjects with spastic extrinsic finger flexor muscles.
Strapless oral-nasal interface for positive-pressure ventilation.
Stroke rehabilitation: a geropsychological perspective.
Childhood stroke after minor neck trauma: case report.
Failure to detect human T-cell leukemia virus-related sequences in multiple sclerosis blood.
Apneic oxygenation in apnea tests for brain death. A controlled trial.
Geographic patterns of parkinsonism-dementia complex on Guam. 1956 through 1985.
Racial differences in the anterior circulation in cerebrovascular disease. How much can be explained by risk factors?
The large striatocapsular infarct. A clinical and pathophysiological entity.
Brain imaging abnormalities in mental disorders of late life.
Adjuvant chemotherapy for primary lymphoma of the central nervous system.
X-linked spinal muscular atrophy (Kennedy's syndrome). A kindred with hypobetalipoproteinemia.
Unusual cause of 'piriformis muscle syndrome'.
Botulinum vs adjustable suture surgery in the treatment of horizontal misalignment in adult patients lacking fusion.
Experimental alcoholic skeletal muscle myopathy is characterised by a rapid and sustained decrease in muscle RNA content.
Epidural hematoma: an unusual presentation.
Cardiac arrhythmias from a malpositioned Greenfield filter in a traumatic quadriplegic.
The supraspinal anxiolytic effect of baclofen for spasticity reduction.
Effect of flumazenil on midazolam-induced amnesia.
Double-blind comparison of topical lignocaine-prilocaine cream (EMLA) and lignocaine infiltration for arterial cannulation in adults.
Cerebral effects of sevoflurane in the dog: comparison with isoflurane and enflurane.
Homocystinuria presenting as central retinal artery occlusion and longstanding thromboembolic disease.
Immunophenotypic characteristics of cerebrospinal fluid cells in children with acute lymphoblastic leukemia at diagnosis.
Unawareness of hypoglycaemia and inadequate hypoglycaemic counterregulation: no causal relation with diabetic autonomic neuropathy
Diffuse idiopathic skeletal hyperostosis (DISH) of the shoulder: a cause of shoulder pain?
Does primary fibromyalgia exist?
Lesions of the mid-shaft of the humerus presenting as shoulder capsulitis.
Mastalgia refractory to drug treatment.
Abdominal wall pain: an alternative diagnosis.
Elevated serum bromide concentrations following repeated halothane anaesthesia in a child.
Anaesthetic management of the brain dead for organ donation.
Left ventricular ejection fraction may not be useful as an end point of thrombolytic therapy comparative trials.
Neurological and ophthalmological phenomena after aortic conduit surgery.
Obstructive sleep apnoea in children undergoing routine tonsillectomy and adenoidectomy.
A randomized comparison of manipulation of the fractured nose under local and general anaesthesia.
Patellar resurfacing in total knee arthroplasty.
Cemented total knee arthroplasty for gonarthrosis in patients 55 years old or younger.
HTLV-I viral-associated myelopathy after blood transfusion in a multiple trauma patient.
Anterior acromioplasty for treatment of the shoulder impingement syndrome.
Long-term morphology of spastic or flaccid muscles in spinal cord-transected rabbits.
Total knee arthroplasty fixation. Comparison of the early results of paired cemented versus uncemented porous coated anatomic knee prostheses.
Cemented and ingrowth fixation of the Miller-Galante prosthesis. Clinical and roentgenographic comparison after three- to six-year follow-up studies.
Seizures in the alcoholic patient.
Neurologic complications of alcoholism.
Anatomical, physiological, and theoretical basis for the antiepileptic effect of vagus nerve stimulation.
Feasibility and safety of vagal stimulation in monkey model.
An implantable neurocybernetic prosthesis system.
Surgical technique for implantation of the neurocybernetic prosthesis.
Efficacy and safety of vagus nerve stimulation in patients with complex partial seizures.
Vagus nerve stimulation in humans: neurophysiological studies and electrophysiological monitoring.
Effects of vagal stimulation on experimentally induced seizures in rats.
Gene mapping and other tools for discovery.
The epilepsies: clinical implications of the international classification.
Experimental models of temporal lobe epilepsy: new insights from the study of kindling and synaptic reorganization.
Mesial temporal sclerosis: pathogenesis, diagnosis, and management.
Post-traumatic epilepsy: cellular mechanisms and implications for treatment.
Transient hyperprolactinemia is associated with a midcycle luteinizing hormone surge.
Local anesthesia for neonatal circumcisions: are family practice residents likely to use it?
Fulminant hepatitis after lisinopril administration.
Heterotopic liver transplantation for fulminant Wilson's disease.
Pain on common bile duct injection during ERCP: does it indicate sphincter of Oddi dysfunction?
Atrial fibrillation in the elderly: management update.
Serious migraine: a study of some epidemiological aspects.
Swimmer's migraine.
Platelet monoamine oxidase activity in female migraine patients.
A protocol for butalbital, aspirin and caffeine (BAC) detoxification in headache patients.
Thermographic findings in cranio-facial pain.
Dissociation between pain and autonomic disturbances in cluster headache.
A study of the seasonal variation of migraine.
Clinical characteristics of migraine and episodic tension-type headache in relation to old and new diagnostic criteria.
Fluctuation in timing of upper airway and chest wall inspiratory muscle activity in obstructive sleep apnea.
Effect of sleep and sleep deprivation on ventilatory response to bronchoconstriction.
Rat soleus muscle ultrastructure after hindlimb suspension.
Cardiovascular responses to arm cranking and FNS-induced leg exercise in paraplegics.
Results of treatment of displaced patellar fractures by partial patellectomy.
Comparison of a hybrid with an uncemented total hip replacement. A retrospective matched-pair study.
The patellofemoral joint after total knee arthroplasty without patellar resurfacing.
Intraoperative assessment of cerebral ischemia during carotid surgery.
Reappraisal of surgical treatment of traumatic transection of the thoracic aorta.
Clonal origin of pituitary adenomas.
Severe lidocaine intoxication by cutaneous absorption.
Traumatic asphyxia.
Mandibular osteomyelitis in a patient with sickle cell anemia: report of case.
Lip paresthesia associated with a jaw mass.
Plasma homocyst(e)ine levels in men with premature coronary artery disease.
Prolonged anginal perceptual threshold in diabetes: effects on exercise capacity and myocardial ischemia.
The role of antihistamine therapy in vascular headaches.
Cognitive function testing in comprehensive geriatric assessment. A comparison of cognitive test performance in residential and clinic settings.
Reference values for the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in octo- and nonagenarians
Foci of increased T2 signal intensity in MR images of healthy elderly subjects. A follow-up study.
Characteristics of an elderly driving population referred to a geriatric assessment center.
Bacterial meningitis in the United States, 1986: report of a multistate surveillance study. The Bacterial Meningitis Study Group.
Decline in the prevalence of childhood deafness in the Jewish population of Jerusalem: ethnic and genetic aspects.
Hoarseness as the sole presenting symptom of foramen magnum meningioma.
Compliance, reliability, and validity of self-monitoring for physical disturbances of Parkinson's disease. The Parkinson's Symptom Diary.
Articulatory impairment associated with tardive dyskinesia.
Untying the gordian knot: the genetics of Tourette syndrome.
Dexamethasone increases plasma levels of albendazole.
Herpes simplex virus type 2 meningitis without genital lesions: an immunoblot study.
Headaches and multiple sclerosis: a clinical study and review of the literature.
Fatal or severely disabling cerebral infarction during hospitalization for stroke or transient ischemic attack.
Unusual blink reflex with four components in a patient with periodic ataxia.
Treatment of chronic relapsing inflammatory demyelinating polyneuropathy by cyclosporin A and plasma exchange. A case report.
Alcohol-dependent unilateral vestibular impairment persisting after a closed head injury.
Questionable role of CNS radioprophylaxis in the therapeutic management of childhood rhabdomyosarcoma with meningeal extension.
Magnetic resonance imaging contrast agents: theory and application to the central nervous system.
Clinoidal meningiomas.
Characterization of periventricular edema in normal-pressure hydrocephalus by measurement of water proton relaxation times.
Systems analysis of cerebrovascular pressure transmission: an observational study in head-injured patients.
Massive increases in extracellular potassium and the indiscriminate release of glutamate following concussive brain injury.
Cerebrovascular and metabolic effects on the rat brain of focal Nd:YAG laser irradiation.
Long-term evaluation of hemiparkinsonian monkeys after adrenal autografting or cavitation alone.
Cerebral venous oxygen content as a measure of brain energy metabolism with increased intracranial pressure and hyperventilation.
Evidence of a local immune activation in cystic brain tumors.
Epithelial cyst of the fourth ventricle. Case report.
Recurrence of acoustic neurilemoma as a malignant spindle-cell neoplasm. Case report.
Toxoplasmosis of the conus medullaris in a patient with hemophilia A-associated AIDS. Case report.
Subarachnoid hemorrhage caused by a fungal aneurysm of the vertebral artery as a complication of intracranial aneurysm clipping. Case report.
Prevention of cardiovascular disease: risks and benefits of aspirin.
Speech, velopharyngeal function, and hearing before and after orthognathic surgery.
Very low birth weight children: behavior problems and school difficulty in a national sample
Serial magnetic resonance imaging in neonatal hypoxic-ischemic encephalopathy.
Intrapartum, intranasal cocaine use and acute fetal distress. A case report.
Facial bone fracture associated with carotid-cavernous sinus fistula.
Alcoholic blackouts: legal implications.
Enveloping the bladder with displacement of flap of the rectus abdominis muscle for the treatment of neurogenic bladder.
Urinary retention due to sacral myeloradiculitis: a clinical and neurophysiological study.
Management of children with myelodysplasia: urological alternatives.
Reverse coitus: mechanism of urethral injury in male partner.
The effect of an alpha-2 agonist on bladder function and cord histology after spinal cord injury [retracted by Weiss R, Tomasula JJ, Sotologo JR Jr. In: J Urol 1991 Aug;146(2):426]
Diclofenac-associated hepatotoxicity
Parathyroid hormone-related peptide in lactation and in umbilical cord blood.
Randomised, double-blind, placebo-controlled trial of nimodipine in acute stroke. Trust Study Group.
National General Practice Study of Epilepsy: newly diagnosed epileptic seizures in a general population.
National General Practice Study of Epilepsy: recurrence after a first seizure
Cerebral malaria in children
Auditory-evoked responses in benign intracranial hypertension syndrome.
The efficacy of brainstem auditory evoked potentials in acoustic tumor surgery.
Circulatory and thermal adjustments to prolonged exercise in paraplegic women.
Coccidioidomycosis during human immunodeficiency virus infection. A review of 77 patients.
Extrapulmonary pneumocystosis: clinical features in human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Responses of intercostal muscle biopsies from normal subjects and patients with myasthenia gravis.
Sensitivity for detecting fibrillation potentials: a comparison between concentric and monopolar needle electrodes.
A review of techniques employed to estimate the number of motor units in a muscle.
Spatial dispersion of magnetic stimulation in peripheral nerves.
AAEM minimonograph #35: Clinical experience with transcranial magnetic stimulation.
Fibrillation potential amplitude and muscle atrophy following peripheral nerve injury.
Critical review of gangliosides and thyrotropin-releasing hormone in peripheral neuromuscular diseases.
The effect of low-dose warfarin on the risk of stroke in patients with nonrheumatic atrial fibrillation. The Boston Area Anticoagulation Trial for Atrial Fibrillation Investigators
Seizures and other neurologic sequelae of bacterial meningitis in children.
The sequelae of Haemophilus influenzae meningitis in school-age children.
Structure, expression and function of a schwannoma-derived growth factor.
Posterior interosseous nerve palsies.
Functional results of facial nerve suture after removal of acoustic neurinoma: analysis of 25 cases.
Extracranial repair of cerebrospinal fluid fistulas: technique and results in 37 patients.
Whither short-course chemotherapy for tuberculous meningitis?
Mild head injury classification.
Diffuse axonal injury: analysis of 100 patients with radiological signs.
Chronic Lyme disease with an expansive granulomatous lesion in the cerebellopontine angle.
Symptomatic pineal cyst: case report.
Clinical study of intracranial nongerminomatous germ cell tumors producing alpha-fetoprotein.
Vagal schwannoma associated with syncopal attacks and postural hypotension: a case report.
Occult vascular malformations of the optic chiasm: magnetic resonance imaging diagnosis and surgical laser resection.
Cyst of the choroid plexus in the lateral ventricle: case report and review of the literature.
Traumatic aneurysm of the superior cerebellar artery: case report and review of the literature.
Intradural herniation of a thoracic disc presenting as flaccid paraplegia: case report.
An unusual complication of silastic dural substitute: case report.
Epidermoid tumors of the 4th ventricle: report of seven cases.
Limited selective posterior rhizotomy for the treatment of spasticity secondary to infantile cerebral palsy: a preliminary report.
Xenon-enhanced computed tomographic measurement of cerebral blood flow in patients with chronic subdural hematomas.
Hypertension as a risk factor for epilepsy after aneurysmal subarachnoid hemorrhage and surgery.
Changes in intracochlear and intracanalicular nerves after acoustic neurinoma excision confirmed by magnetic resonance imaging.
Fractures of the clivus: classification and clinical features.
Clinicopathological experience with pineocytomas: report of five surgically treated cases.
Concurrent intradural and extradural meningiomas of the cervical spine.
Intradural spinal cord tumor presenting as a subarachnoid hemorrhage: magnetic resonance imaging diagnosis.
Myelopathy presenting decades after surgery for congenital cervical cutaneous lesions.
Paraplegia after a routine lumbar laminectomy: report of a rare complication and successful management.
Pituitary hemorrhage into a Rathke's cleft cyst
Mechanism of stroke in patients taking aspirin.
Aspiration in bilateral stroke patients.
Prolonged confusion following convulsions due to generalized nonconvulsive status epilepticus.
Verbal memory impairment correlates with hippocampal pyramidal cell density.
A case-control study of Alzheimer's disease in Australia.
The opposite pupil in herniation.
Spatiotemporal contrast sensitivity differs in normal aging and Parkinson's disease.
Cytokine accumulations in CSF of multiple sclerosis patients: frequent detection of interleukin-1 and tumor necrosis factor but not interleukin-6.
Catecholaminergic systems in the medulla oblongata in parkinsonian syndromes: a quantitative immunohistochemical study in Parkinson's disease, progressive supranuclear palsy, and striatonigral degeneration.
Anti-GM1 IgM antibodies in motor neuron disease and neuropathy.
Kearns-Sayre syndrome presenting as renal tubular acidosis.
Antibodies to synthetic peptide (125-148) of the alpha-subunit of human nicotinic acetylcholine receptor in sera from patients with myasthenia gravis.
Streptococcus bovis meningitis: report of 2 cases.
A comparison of regulatory cells in spinal fluid and blood in patients with multiple sclerosis and other neurologic diseases.
Eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome (L-tryptophan-associated neuromyopathy).
Visual disturbance in patients with melanocytoma of the optic disk.
Signs distinguishing spasmus nutans (with and without central nervous system lesions) from infantile nystagmus.
Late juvenile-onset Krabbe's disease.
Pharmacological versus non-pharmacological prophylaxis of recurrent migraine headache: a meta-analytic review of clinical trials.
Antinociception and cardiovascular responses produced by electrical stimulation in the nucleus tractus solitarius, nucleus reticularis ventralis, and the caudal medulla.
Clinical judgments in pain management.
Pain relief achieved by transcutaneous electrical nerve stimulation and/or vibratory stimulation in a case of painful legs and moving toes.
Heritability of symptoms in an experimental model of neuropathic pain.
Adrenal medullary implants in the rat spinal cord reduce nociception in a chronic pain model.
Interactions between substance P, calcitonin gene-related peptide, taurine and excitatory amino acids in the spinal cord.
Thrombocytosis after pneumonia with empyema and other bacterial infections in children.
Central nervous system tuberculosis in children: a review of 30 cases.
Acute pain relief.
Chronic pain.
Pain in children.
Confusion.
When epilepsy masquerades as heart disease. Awareness is key to avoiding misdiagnosis.
Steroids induce acetylcholine receptors on cultured human muscle: implications for myasthenia gravis.
Controlling stability of a complex movement system.
Interferon system and natural killer cell activity in myasthenia gravis.
Haemostatic changes in the loin pain and haematuria syndrome: secondary to renal vasospasm?
Tropical neuromyelopathies and retroviruses: a review.
Tamoxifen therapy for painful idiopathic gynecomastia.
Normeperidine-induced seizures in hereditary coproporphyria.
Postural hypotension: pressor effect of octreotide not mediated by norepinephrine.
Synchronous Hodgkin's disease and myelofibrosis terminating with granulocytic sarcoma and acute megakaryocytic leukemia.
Persistent segmental cutaneous anesthesia after a brown recluse spider bite.
Neurologic abnormalities in a patient with human ehrlichiosis.
Stroke in systemic lupus erythematosus [published erratum appears in Stroke 1991 Mar;22(3):417]
Surgical experience with cerebral amyloid angiopathy.
Remote effect of deep-seated vascular brain lesions on cerebral blood flow.
Correlation of clinical and computed tomographic findings in stroke patients.
Effect of emitted power on waveform intensity in transcranial Doppler
Moderate hypothermia after cardiac arrest of 17 minutes in dogs. Effect on cerebral and cardiac outcome.
Progressing cerebral infarction in relation to plasma glucose in gerbils.
Embolic stroke after smoking "crack" cocaine.
Progress report of the Stroke Prevention in Atrial Fibrillation Study.
Growth factor expression after stroke.
Genetics of cerebrovascular disease.
Molecular biology of atherothrombotic brain infarction.
Modification of stroke susceptibility by genotype-dependent maternal influences.
Pharmacology of recovery after stroke.
Multilevel transneuronal degeneration after brain damage. Behavioral events and effects of anticonvulsant gamma-aminobutyric acid-related drugs.
Influence of amphetamine treatment on somatosensory function of the normal and infarcted rat brain.
Effects of MK-801 on recovery from sensorimotor cortex lesions.
Ionic channels, cholinergic mechanisms, and recovery of sensorimotor function after neocortical infarcts in rats.
Magnetic resonance imaging demonstrates that electric stimulation of cerebellar fastigial nucleus reduces cerebral infarction in rats.
Symptomatic carotid endarterectomy trials.
The pathophysiology of anoxic injury in central nervous system white matter.
Putative neuroexcitation in cerebral ischemia and brain injury.
Platelet-activating factor. A putative mediator in central nervous system injury?
Bacteremia in an ambulatory setting. Improved outcome in children treated with antibiotics.
Physical features of Prader-Willi syndrome in neonates.
Replication patterns of the fragile X in heterozygous carriers: analysis by a BrdUrd antibody method.
Serum aldolase isozyme levels in patients with cerebrovascular diseases.
The "stuck twin" phenomenon: ultrasonographic findings, pregnancy outcome, and management with serial amniocenteses.
Pregnancy in a patient with treated Wilson's disease: a case report.
Prenatal diagnosis of fetal intracranial calcifications.
Practical aspects of pulsatile gonadotropin-releasing hormone administration.
Orbital intramuscular schwannoma.
South American blastomycosis: ophthalmic and oculomotor nerve lesions.
Attenuation of suxamethonium myalgias. Effect of midazolam and vecuronium.
Spinal catheter anaesthesia for caesarean section in a patient with spina bifida.
The Woolley and Roe case. A reassessment.
Autonomic dysfunction and Guillain-Barre syndrome. The use of esmolol in its management.
Loss of consciousness after emergence from anaesthesia. A case of suspected micturition syncope.
An evaluation of a 30-gauge needle for spinal anaesthesia for caesarean section.
Intrathecal anaesthesia for day-care surgery. A retrospective study of 160 cases using 25- and 26-gauge spinal needles.
Relief of injection pain in adults. EMLA cream for 5 minutes before venepuncture.
Resistance to atracurium-induced neuromuscular blockade in patients with intractable seizure disorders treated with anticonvulsants.
Infection during chronic epidural catheterization: diagnosis and treatment.
Differential effect of oncotic pressure on cerebral and extracerebral water content during cardiopulmonary bypass in rabbits.
Buffered versus plain lidocaine as a local anesthetic for simple laceration repair.
Neurologic complications of cocaine abuse.
Occipital condyle fracture presenting as retropharyngeal hematoma.
Erythromycin failure with subsequent Pasteurella multocida meningitis and septic arthritis in a cat-bite victim.
Distinguishable types of dyspnea in patients with shortness of breath.
Carotid endarterectomy for elderly patients: predicting complications
Emergence of recreational drug abuse as a major risk factor for stroke in young adults
Improving outcomes of analgesic treatment: is education enough?
Clarifying confusion: the confusion assessment method. A new method for detection of delirium
Stroke in pediatric acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Myasthenic thymus and thymoma are selectively enriched in acetylcholine receptor-reactive T cells.
Auras and subclinical seizures: characteristics and prognostic significance.
Increased MEPP frequency as an early sign of experimental immune-mediated motoneuron disease.
Anoxic injury of mammalian central white matter: decreased susceptibility in myelin-deficient optic nerve.
Substantia nigra: a site of action of muscle relaxant drugs.
Polyneuropathy, ophthalmoplegia, leukoencephalopathy, and intestinal pseudo-obstruction: POLIP syndrome.
Major histocompatibility complex antigen expression in the affected tissues in amyotrophic lateral sclerosis.
IgM deposits at nodes of Ranvier in a patient with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, anti-GM1 antibodies, and multifocal motor conduction block.
Spinal cord compression with paraplegia in xanthomatosis due to normocholesterolemic sitosterolemia.
Ichthyosis, mental retardation, and asymptomatic spasticity. A new neurocutaneous syndrome with normal fatty alcohol:NAD+ oxidoreductase activity.
Ischaemic brain lesions diagnosed at birth in preterm infants: clinical events and developmental outcome.
Area of lateral ventricles measured on cranial ultrasonography in preterm infants: association with outcome.
Skin conductance and arousal in the newborn.
The acutely affected abdomen in paraplegic spinal cord injury patients.
Does carotid restenosis predict an increased risk of late symptoms, stroke, or death?
Choreoathetosis after deep hypothermia without circulatory arrest
Vagal schwannoma.
Role of perfusion pressure and flow in major organ dysfunction after cardiopulmonary bypass.
Misdiagnosis in patients with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis.
Syncope and presyncope associated with probable adverse drug reactions.
Epidemiologic features of asymptomatic cerebral infarction in patients with nonvalvular atrial fibrillation.
Acute autonomic neuropathy. Two cases and a clinical review.
Recurrent meningitis in a patient with congenital deficiency of the C9 component of complement. First case of C9 deficiency in Europe.
Gilles de la Tourette syndrome is not linked to D2-dopamine receptor.
Quantitative evaluation of sway as an indicator of functional balance in post-traumatic brain injury.
Asymptomatic ulnar neuropathy in carpal tunnel syndrome.
Postoperative complications in patients with disabling psychiatric illnesses or intellectual handicaps. A case-controlled, retrospective analysis.
The influence of hyperglycemia and diabetes mellitus on immediate and 3-month morbidity and mortality after acute stroke.
Screening for early dementia using memory complaints from patients and relatives.
Cerebrospinal fluid as a reflector of central cholinergic and amino acid neurotransmitter activity in cerebellar ataxia.
Asthma and eczema in children born to women with migraine.
Temporoparietal cortex in aphasia. Evidence from positron emission tomography.
Unusual cerebral manifestations in hereditary fructose intolerance.
Nontropical pyomyositis as a cause of subacute, multifocal myalgia in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Neurodevelopmental outcome of children with evidence of periventricular leukomalacia on late MRI.
Rett syndrome: cerebellar pathology.
Recurrent lateral rectus palsy in childhood.
Ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging in Leigh disease.
Rett syndrome: findings suggesting axonopathy and mitochondrial abnormalities.
West syndrome associated with hyperlexia.
Flow cytometric DNA content of adenoid cystic carcinoma of submandibular gland. Correlation of histologic features and prognosis.
The use of obstetric analgesia in Sweden 1983-1986
Choroid plexus cysts and chromosomal defects
Neurologic complications in chronic renal failure: a retrospective study.
Evaluation and treatment of mental disorders in patients with AIDS.
Schindler disease: the molecular lesion in the alpha-N-acetylgalactosaminidase gene that causes an infantile neuroaxonal dystrophy.
Effect of normal MSAFP screening on maternal age for genetic amniocentesis.
Acupuncture and chronic pain: a criteria-based meta-analysis.
The role of carotid screening before coronary artery bypass.
A single cholesterol measurement underestimates the risk of coronary heart disease. An empirical example from the Lipid Research Clinics Mortality Follow-up Study.
Acute syphilitic posterior placoid chorioretinitis.
Repetitive strain injuries. How to deal with 'the epidemic of the 1990s'.
Treating systemic fungal infections in AIDS patients. Prolonging life against the odds.
Rigid fixation of internal orbital fractures.
Early cerebral infarction: gadopentetate dimeglumine enhancement
Embolization with particles in thoracic intramedullary arteriovenous malformations: long-term angiographic and clinical results.
Graves orbitopathy: correlation of CT and clinical findings.
Neuromuscular diseases: evaluation with high-frequency sonography.
Emergency portosystemic shunt in patients with variceal bleeding.
Vancomycin pharmacokinetics in hydrocephalic shunt prophylaxis and relationship to ventricular volume.
Cerebral blood flow velocities in the anterior cerebral arteries and basilar artery in hydrocephalus before and after treatment.
Brain stem tuberculoma in adult patients: diagnosis and treatment.
Cerebral hemodynamics in patients with normal pressure hydrocephalus: correlation between cerebral circulation time and dementia.
Aqueductal (pencil) glioma presenting as neurogenic pulmonary edema: a case report.
Metoprolol for aggressive behavior in persons with mental retardation.
Concomitant neurocysticercosis and brucellosis.
The deja vu experience: remembrance of things past?
Brainstem auditory evoked response and subcortical abnormalities in autism.
The UCLA-University of Utah epidemiologic survey of autism: the etiologic role of rare diseases.
Pharmacologic treatment of noncognitive behavioral disturbances in elderly demented patients.
Steroid anabolic drugs and arterial complications in an athlete--a case history.
Type I hypersensitivity to rubber.
Cystocerebral syndrome. Acute urinary retention presenting as confusion in elderly patients.
Rapid eye movement sleep deprivation as a probe in elderly subjects.
Altered waveform of plasma nocturnal melatonin secretion in premenstrual depression.
A study of immunoglobulin G in the cerebrospinal fluid of 1007 patients with suspected neurological disease using isoelectric focusing and the Log IgG-Index. A comparison and diagnostic applications.
Congenital myasthenia associated with facial malformations in Iraqi and Iranian Jews. A new genetic syndrome.
Myelopathy associated with human T cell lymphotropic virus type I (HTLV-I) in natal, South Africa. A clinical and investigative study in 24 patients.
Heterogeneity in progressive aphasia due to focal cortical atrophy. A clinical and PET study.
Developmental dysmnesia in a poor reader.
Familial paroxysmal kinesigenic ataxia and continuous myokymia.
The comportmental learning disabilities of early frontal lobe damage.
Cerebral blood flow in progressive aphasia without dementia. Case report, using 133xenon inhalation, technetium 99m hexamethylpropyleneamine oxime and single photon emission computerized tomography.
The anatomical basis of the caecocentral scotoma. New observations and a review.
The distribution of muscle weakness in upper motoneuron lesions affecting the lower limb.
Innervation territories for touch and pain afferents of single fascicles of the human ulnar nerve. Mapping through intraneural microrecording and microstimulation.
Volume conduction of the parietal N20 potential to the prerolandic frontal area.
Selective spatial attention in patients with visual extinction.
Osseointegration of titanium implants in total hip arthroplasty.
Intraoperative dexamethasone irrigation in lumbar microdiskectomy.
Continuous removal of middle molecules by hemofiltration in patients with acute liver failure.
A limited diagnostic investigation for obstructive sleep apnea syndrome. Oximetry and static charge sensitive bed.
Systemic hypertension in sleep apnea syndrome. Relationship with sleep architecture and breathing abnormalities.
Clinical dysautonomia in patients with bronchial asthma. Study with seven autonomic function tests.
Maxillofacial surgery and nasal CPAP. A comparison of treatment for obstructive sleep apnea syndrome
Lack of change in neurochemical markers during the postepileptic phase of intrahippocampal tetanus toxin syndrome in rats.
Some endorphin derivatives and hydrocortisone prevent EEG limbic seizures induced by corticotropin-releasing factor in rabbits.
Neonatal monosodium glutamate abolishes corticotropin-releasing factor-induced epileptogenic activity in rats.
Triiodothyronine and brain excitability.
Epidemiology of epilepsy in Guaymi Indians from Bocas del Toro Province, Republic of Panama.
Electrocorticographic confirmation of focal positron emission tomographic abnormalities in children with intractable epilepsy.
Lateralized effects of subclinical epileptiform EEG discharges on scholastic performance in children.
Topographic comparative study of magnetic resonance imaging and electroencephalography in 34 children with tuberous sclerosis.
Landau-Kleffner syndrome: a clinical and EEG study of five cases.
Landau-Kleffner syndrome: a pharmacologic study of five cases.
Cerebral glucose utilization during sleep in Landau-Kleffner syndrome: a PET study.
Gastrointestinal motor dysfunction in acquired selective cholinergic dysautonomia associated with infectious mononucleosis.
Silent cerebrovascular disease in the elderly. Correlation with ambulatory pressure.
Effect of age on the efficacy of blood pressure treatment strategies.
Glucocorticoid-induced muscle atrophy prevention by exercise in fast-twitch fibers.
Failed acromioplasty for impingement syndrome.
Effect of the topical anesthetic EMLA on the efficacy of pulsed dye laser treatment of port-wine stains.
Disturbance in daily sleep/wake patterns in patients with cognitive impairment and decreased daily activity.
What practicing physicians in North Carolina rate as their most challenging geriatric medicine concerns.
Delirium: masquerades and misdiagnosis in elderly inpatients.
Primary intratemporal tumours of the facial nerve: diagnosis and treatment.
Parapharyngeal abscess and torticollis.
Outcome of pregnancies experienced during residency.
Immunopathology and viral reactivation. A general theory of schizophrenia.
Multiple muscle enzyme release with psychiatric illness.
Infarction in the territory of the medial branch of the posterior inferior cerebellar artery.
Transcranial electrical motor evoked potentials as a prognostic indicator for motor recovery in stroke patients.
Parkinsonian tremor loses its alternating aspect during non-REM sleep and is inhibited by REM sleep.
The effects of cyproheptadine on locomotion and on spasticity in patients with spinal cord injuries.
Motor unit discharge characteristics and short term synchrony in paraplegic humans.
Magnetic and electrical stimulation of cervical motor roots: technique, site and mechanisms of excitation.
Eosinophilic meningitis: cause of a chronic pain syndrome.
Rigid spine syndrome with respiratory failure.
Learning a unimanual motor skill by partial commissurotomy patients.
Involvement of the central nervous system in chronic inflammatory demyelinating polyneuropathy: a clinical, electrophysiological and magnetic resonance imaging study.
Hip pain in late pregnancy.
Non-vesicular release of glutamate from glial cells by reversed electrogenic glutamate uptake.
Long-term potentiation of electrotonic coupling at mixed synapses.
Indications for thymectomy in myasthenia gravis.
Phenotypic heterogeneity of spinal muscular atrophy mapping to chromosome 5q11.2-13.3 (SMA 5q).
Routine and quantitative EEG analysis in Gilles de la Tourette's syndrome.
Internuclear ophthalmoplegia in the Chiari type II malformation.
Sensory visual testing in idiopathic intracranial hypertension: measures sensitive to change.
Deteriorating ischemic stroke: risk factors and prognosis.
Infantile CNS spongy degeneration--14 cases: clinical update.
Dominantly inherited apathy, central hypoventilation, and Parkinson's syndrome: clinical, biochemical, and neuropathologic studies of 2 new cases.
Sensorineural hearing loss: a reversible effect of valproic acid.
Large cystic optic glioma.
Study of verbal description in neuropathic pain.
Quantification of biomedical findings of chronic pain patients: development of an index of pathology.
Is emotional disturbance a precipitator or a consequence of chronic pain?
Epidural haematoma requiring surgical decompression following repeated cervical epidural steroid injections for chronic pain.
Quantitative evaluation of hypnotically suggested hyperaesthesia and analgesia by painful laser stimulation.
Cytoreductive hepatic surgery for neuroendocrine tumors.
Pharyngeal shape and dimensions in healthy subjects, snorers, and patients with obstructive sleep apnoea.
Role of serum prolactin determination in evaluation of impotent patient.
Retrograde transurethral balloon dilation of prostate: innovative management of abacterial chronic prostatitis and prostatodynia.
Protecting the vasculature: an eye toward the future.
Anisocoria in the pigmentary dispersion syndrome
Laser placement in noncontact Nd:YAG cyclophotocoagulation.
Antinociceptive interaction between opioids and medetomidine: systemic additivity and spinal synergy.
Calcium antagonists in the management of patients with aneurysmal subarachnoid hemorrhage: a review.
Sudden blindness after thermocoagulation of the trigeminal ganglion.
Short stature, mental retardation, and hypoparathyroidism: a new syndrome.
Survey of adolescents with severe intellectual handicap.
Continuous papaveretum infusion for the control of pain in painful sickling crisis.
Benign intracranial hypertension after ciprofloxacin administration.
Endocrine function and morphological findings in patients with disorders of the hypothalamo-pituitary area: a study with magnetic resonance.
Central nervous system vasculitis after chickenpox--cause or coincidence?
Pneumocephalus secondary to a high-pressure water injury to the nose.
Quantitative assessment of extradural bupivacaine analgesia.
Onset phase of spinal bupivacaine analgesia assessed quantitatively by laser stimulation.
Are myotonias and periodic paralyses associated with susceptibility to malignant hyperthermia?
7th nerve palsy after extradural blood patch.
Bladder function in the mentally retarded.
Lens opacity as a predictor of visual field impairment due to cataract.
Choroid plexus tumors in the breast cancer-sarcoma syndrome.
Codeine increases pain thresholds to copper vapor laser stimuli in extensive but not poor metabolizers of sparteine.
Effects of a multidisciplinary management program on neurologically impaired patients with dysphagia.
Changes in thermal and mechanical pain thresholds in hand amputees. A clinical and physiological long-term follow-up.
Recurrent pain, illness intrusiveness, and quality of life in end-stage renal disease.
Health locus of control, gender differences and adjustment to persistent pain.
Neonatal facial and cry responses to invasive and non-invasive procedures.
Treatment of reflex sympathetic dystrophy with topical capsaicin. Case report.
Receptor changes in the spinal cord of sheep associated with exposure to chronic pain.
Characterization of descending inhibition and facilitation from the nuclei reticularis gigantocellularis and gigantocellularis pars alpha in the rat.
Transcranial electrical stimulation with high frequency intermittent current (Limoge's) potentiates opiate-induced analgesia: blind studies.
Induction, blockade and restoration of a persistent hypersensitive state.
The influence of warning signal timing and cognitive preparation on the aversiveness of electric shock.
Efficacy of methylphenidate among mentally retarded children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.
Quantifying language development from birth to 3 years using the Early Language Milestone Scale.
Unilateral hydrocephalus in adults.
Cerebrospinal fluid endothelin-1 and endothelin-3 levels in normal and neurosurgical patients: a clinical study and literature review.
Familial trigeminal neuralgia and Charcot-Marie-Tooth neuropathy. Report of two families and review.
Reversal of chronic hepatic encephalopathy by colonic exclusion: poor correlation with blood GABA levels.
Surgical correction of the snapping iliopsoas tendon.
Anteromedial tibial tubercle transfer without bone graft.
Arterial abnormalities of the hand in athletes.
Community hospital carotid endarterectomy in patients over age 75.
Alkalinisation of prilocaine for intravenous regional anaesthesia. Suitability for clinical use.
pH-adjustment and discomfort caused by the intradermal injection of lignocaine [published erratum appears in Anaesthesia 1991 Mar;46(3):242]
Nasal and oral flow-volume loops in normal subjects and patients with obstructive sleep apnea.
The South Karelia Air Pollution Study. The effects of malodorous sulfur compounds from pulp mills on respiratory and other symptoms.
Brain microemboli during cardiac surgery or aortography
Synaptic transmission in human neocortex removed for treatment of intractable epilepsy in children.
Treatment of spasticity with botulinum toxin: a double-blind study.
Peripheral neuropathy associated with eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Adult phosphorylase b kinase deficiency.
NMDA antagonists potentiate antiparkinsonian actions of L-dopa in monoamine-depleted rats.
Cerebrospinal fluid neopterin in human immunodeficiency virus type 1 infection.
Alpha 1-antichymotrypsin as a possible biochemical marker for Alzheimer-type dementia.
Failure of nine-month phenobarbital administration to reverse amygdaloid-kindled seizure susceptibility in cats.
Aggravation of myasthenia gravis by erythromycin.
Familial Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease without periodic EEG activity.
Fetal homotransplants (ventral mesencephalon and adrenal tissue) to the striatum of parkinsonian subjects.
Autologous transplantation of adrenal medulla in Parkinson's disease. 18-month results.
White matter hyperintensities in dementia of Alzheimer's type and in healthy subjects without cerebrovascular risk factors. A magnetic resonance imaging study.
Clinical and positron emission tomographic studies in the 'extrapyramidal syndrome' of dementia of the Alzheimer type.
Acquired childhood aphasia. Outcome 1 year after onset.
Primary progressive aphasia. Longitudinal course, neuropsychological profile, and language features.
Plasticity in the aging brain. Reversibility of anatomic, metabolic, and cognitive deficits in normal-pressure hydrocephalus following shunt surgery.
Effects of physostigmine on spatial attention in patients with progressive supranuclear palsy.
Cumulative AIDS incidence and altered mortality from bacterial infections.
Safety, stability, and effectiveness of immunoadsorption under membrane plasmapheresis treatment for myasthenia gravis.
An extracorporeal perfusion system to bridge pediatric liver transplant candidates.
Aids for visual impairment.
Gallbladder surgery following cholecystlithotripsy: suggested guidelines for treatment
Cerebrospinal norepinephrine concentrations and the duration of epidural analgesia
Crico-tracheal disruption and common carotid artery occlusion: a case of blunt trauma.
From disease to delirium: managing the declining elderly patient.
Evidence for motor neuropathy and reduced filling of the rectum in chronic intractable constipation.
Phenotypic and functional characterization of T cells from patients with myasthenia gravis.
Causes of death in the elderly and their changing pattern in Hisayama, a Japanese community. Results from a long-term and autopsy-based study.
Sphenoid sinusitis, a cause of debilitating headache.
Blepharospasm-oromandibular dystonia associated with a left cerebellopontine angle meningioma.
Reliability of death certificate diagnoses.
Sensitivity of effect variables in rheumatoid arthritis: a meta-analysis of 130 placebo controlled NSAID trials [published erratum appears in J Clin Epidemiol 1991;44(6):613]
Examination by logistic regression modelling of the variables which increase the relative risk of elderly women falling compared to elderly men.
Restricted dose and duration of corticosteroid treatment in patients with polymyalgia rheumatica and temporal arteritis.
Psychological stress and the fibrositis/fibromyalgia syndrome.
Diagnostic criteria for neuropsychiatric systemic lupus erythematosus: the results of a consensus meeting. The Ad Hoc Neuropsychiatric Lupus Workshop Group.
Severe cerebral and systemic necrotizing vasculitis developing during pregnancy in a case of systemic lupus erythematosus.
Gynecologic cancer in patients with subacute cerebellar degeneration predicted by anti-Purkinje cell antibodies and limited in metastatic volume.
Selected neurologic complications of pregnancy.
Quinine-induced disseminated intravascular coagulation.
The effect of epilepsy or diabetes mellitus on the risk of automobile accidents
Imaging the fetal brain in the second and third trimesters using transvaginal sonography.
Botulinum treatment of childhood strabismus.
Bicarbonate-buffered lidocaine-epinephrine-hyaluronidase for eyelid anesthesia.
Optic nerve sheath meningoceles. Clinical and radiographic features in 13 cases with a review of the literature
Long-term visual outcome in patients with optic nerve pit and serous retinal detachment of the macula
The risk for systemic vascular diseases and mortality in patients with central retinal vein occlusion.
Strategies underlying the control of disordered movement.
A new challenge--robotics in the rehabilitation of the neurologically motor impaired.
Brain potentials associated with movement in traumatic brain injury.
Movement disorders--limb movement and the basal ganglia.
Three-dimensional reconstructed MR imaging of the inner ear.
Neuroophthalmologic effects of intravenous magnesium sulfate.
Oral contraception in disease states.
Treatment of patients with aortic dissection presenting with peripheral vascular complications.
Return to work for persons with traumatic brain injury: a supported employment approach.
Functional evaluation of quadriplegic patients using a hand neuroprosthesis.
Impaired awareness of behavioral limitations after traumatic brain injury.
Maximal exercise testing of mentally retarded adolescents and adults: reliability study.
Recovery from vegetative state of six months' duration associated with Sinemet (levodopa/carbidopa).
Threshold perimetry in tilted disc syndrome.
Familial trigeminal anesthesia.
Tumor necrosis factor and severe malaria.
Tumor-associated neurological dysfunction prevented by lazaroids in rats.
Enhanced in vitro uptake and retention of 3H-tetraphenylphosphonium by nervous system tumor cells.
Epidermoid cysts of the brain stem. Report of three cases.
Pseudopsammomatous meningioma with elevated serum carcinoembryonic antigen: a true secretory meningioma. Case report.
Tension pneumocephalus: treatment with controlled decompression via a closed water-seal drainage system. Case report.
Risks factors for cerebral infarction in good-grade patients after aneurysmal subarachnoid hemorrhage and surgery: a prospective study.
Cerebrospinal fluid rhinorrhea following acoustic neurinoma surgery. Technical note.
The effect of glucose administration on carbohydrate metabolism after head injury.
Shunt surgery for hydrocephalus in tuberculous meningitis: a long-term follow-up study.
Management of meralgia paresthetica
Long-term effects of nimodipine on cerebral infarcts and outcome after aneurysmal subarachnoid hemorrhage and surgery.
Effects of tromethamine and hyperventilation on brain injury in the cat.
Post-traumatic intracerebral pneumatocele: case report.
Fracture-dislocation of the base of the fifth metacarpal with an ulnar motor nerve lesion: case report.
Otolaryngologic management of patients with subdural empyema.
Magnetic resonance imaging of facial nerve neuromas.
Sternocleidomastoid muscle transfer and superficial musculoaponeurotic system plication in the prevention of Frey's syndrome
Neurotologic findings in basilar migraine.
Headache. Public health problem.
The classification and diagnosis of headache disorders.
Basic mechanisms in vascular headache.
The concept of migraine as a state of central neuronal hyperexcitability.
Developments in 5-hydroxytryptamine receptor pharmacology in migraine.
Manifestations of migraine.
Modern pharmacotherapy of migraine.
Advances in cluster headache.
Drug-induced headache.
Oromandibular disorders and headache. A critical appraisal.
Headache and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Psychologic and behavioral aspects of chronic headache.
Development of a traumatic intracranial hematoma after a "minor" head injury.
Experimental intracerebral hemorrhage: early removal of a spontaneous mass lesion improves late outcome.
The Children's Orientation and Amnesia Test: relationship to severity of acute head injury and to recovery of memory.
Surgical decompression without transposition for ulnar neuropathy: factors determining outcome.
Hemorrhagic pituitary adenomas: clinicopathological features and surgical treatment.
The association of hydrocephalus with intramedullary spinal cord tumors: a series of 25 patients.
Antimigraine treatment for slit ventricle syndrome.
Meningiomas involving the clivus: a six-year experience with 41 patients.
Entrapment neuropathy of the median nerve at the level of the ligament of Struthers.
Spinal hemangioblastoma, syrinx, and hydrocephalus in a two-year-old child.
An intracranial mass lesion in systemic xanthogranulomatosis: case report.
Fine surface structure of an intraspinal neurenteric cyst: a scanning and transmission electron microscopy study.
Syringomyelia secondary to compression of the cervical spinal cord by an extramedullary lymphoma.
Stridor: intracranial pathology causing postextubation vocal cord paralysis.
Relationship between duration of spinal cord ischemia and postoperative neurologic deficits in animals.
Urologic function after experimental cauda equina compression. Cystometrograms versus cortical-evoked potentials.
Delayed anterior decompression in patients with spinal cord and cauda equina injuries of the thoracolumbar spine.
Blood flow direction in the lumbar nerve root.
Therapy of diseased stroke-prone spontaneously hypertensive rats with nimodipine.
Preventing stroke by the modification of risk factors.
Cytosolic free calcium during focal cerebral ischemia and the effects of nimodipine on calcium and histologic damage.
Effect of nimodipine on acute ischemic stroke. Pooled results from five randomized trials.
Effects of nimodipine on infarct size and cerebral acidosis after middle cerebral artery occlusion in the rat.
Effects of dietary calcium on nimodipine-sensitive calcium channel function in stroke-prone spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Tardive dyskinesia.
Cerebellar syndrome caused by isoniazid.
Excipients in valproic acid syrup may cause diarrhea: a case report.
The relationship between viral RNA, myelin-specific mRNAs, and demyelination in central nervous system disease during Theiler's virus infection.
Sleep disturbances in survivors of the Nazi Holocaust.
Use of neuroleptic-induced extrapyramidal symptoms to predict future vulnerability to side effects.
Acute phase reactants and risk of bacterial meningitis among febrile infants and children.
Emergency department approach to managing seizures in pregnancy.
Large-scale neurocognitive networks and distributed processing for attention, language, and memory.
Impairment of sequences of memory-guided saccades after supplementary motor area lesions.
Brain pH in head injury: an image-guided 31P magnetic resonance spectroscopy study.
Respiratory failure and unilateral caudal brainstem infarction.
Magnetic motor-evoked potentials in epilepsy: effects of the disease and of anticonvulsant medication.
Isolation of a complementary DNA clone encoding an autoantigen recognized by an anti-neuronal cell antibody from a patient with paraneoplastic cerebellar degeneration.
A follow-up study of intractable seizures in childhood.
Stiff-man syndrome: a GABAergic autoimmune disorder with autoantigenic heterogeneity.
Relationship of clinical features with psychological status in primary fibromyalgia.
Septic arthritis of the C1-C2 lateral facet joint and torticollis: pseudo-Grisel's syndrome.
Sleep disturbances in HIV-infected homosexual men.
New angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitors. Their role in the management of hypertension.
Brain death and organ donation in a neurosurgical unit: audit of recent practice
The appearance of the piriformis muscle syndrome in computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging. A case report and review of the literature.
Noncardiogenic pulmonary edema complicating massive diltiazem overdose.
Visceral perception in health and functional dyspepsia. Crossover study of gastric distension with placebo and domperidone.
Bowel dysfunction in fibromyalgia syndrome.
Treatment of fulminant hepatic failure with insulin and glucagon. A randomized, controlled trial.
Analgesic use: a study of treatments used by patients for migraine prior to attending the City of London Migraine Clinic.
Vasospasm contributes to monosodium glutamate-induced headache.
Alteration of platelet serotonin in patients with chronic tension-type headache during cold pressor test.
The blink reflex in cluster headache.
Assessment and treatment of children's headaches from a developmental perspective.
Health status in patients with tension headache treated with acupuncture or physiotherapy.
Nocturnal sleep recording with cassette EEG in chronic headaches.
Contingent Negative Variation in migraine.
Centrifugal intensity and duration as countermeasures to soleus muscle atrophy.
Effects of carotid denervation and decerebration on ventilatory response to CO.
The association of carotid artery stenosis with carotid sinus hypersensitivity. Transitory cerebral ischaemic attack provoked by carotid sinus reflex
Elevated serum concentrations of IgE antibodies to environmental antigens in HIV-seropositive male homosexuals.
Florid refractory schizophrenias that turn out to be treatable variants of HLA-associated narcolepsy.
The long-distance effects of brain lesions: visualization of myelinated pathways in the human brain using polarizing and fluorescence microscopy.
The neuromuscular pathology of the Eosinophilia-Myalgia syndrome.
Magnetic resonance imaging and tomographic evaluation of occlusal appliance treatment for advanced internal derangement of the temporomandibular joint.
Neurotoxic action of veratridine in rat brain neuronal cultures: mechanism of neuroprotection by Ca++ antagonists nonselective for slow Ca++ channels.
The cholecystokinin receptor antagonist devazepide enhances morphine-induced analgesia but not morphine-induced respiratory depression in the squirrel monkey.
Central adenosinergic system involvement in ethanol-induced motor incoordination in mice.
Interactions between N-methyl-D-aspartate and CGS 19755 administered intramuscularly and intracerebroventricularly in pigeons.
Mechanical restraint use among residents of skilled nursing facilities. Prevalence, patterns, and predictors
The J-curve phenomenon and the treatment of hypertension. Is there a point beyond which pressure reduction is dangerous?
Response to treatment with antihistamines in a family with myotonia congenita.
Nd:YAG-laser in the microsurgery of frontobasal meningiomas.
Fulminating multiple sclerosis-like leukoencephalopathy revealing human immunodeficiency virus infection.
Transcranial Doppler in acute hemispheric brain infarction.
Serum and CSF levels of IL-2, sIL-2R, TNF-alpha, and IL-1 beta in chronic progressive multiple sclerosis: expected lack of clinical utility.
Neonatal subependymal giant cell astrocytoma associated with tuberous sclerosis: MRI, CT, and ultrasound correlation.
Absence of acetylcholine-induced current in epithelial cells from thymus glands and thymomas of myasthenia gravis patients.
"Pseudospasticity" in Guillain-Barre syndrome.
Suppression of carbamazepine-induced rash with prednisone.
Handcuff neuropathies
Brain and spinal cord hemorrhage in long-term survivors of malignant pediatric brain tumors: a possible late effect of therapy.
Myelopathic neurosarcoidosis: diagnostic value of enhanced MRI.
Mesencephalic cholinergic nuclei in progressive supranuclear palsy.
Cerebral atrophy in habitual cocaine abusers: a planimetric CT study.
Central nervous system involvement in Von Hippel-Lindau disease.
Migraine and vertebrobasilar ischemia.
Primary leptomeningeal lymphoma: report of 9 cases, diagnosis with immunocytochemical analysis, and review of the literature.
Dysgeusia, gustatory sweating, and crocodile tears syndrome induced by a cerebellopontine angle meningioma.
Cefotaxime and aminoglycoside treatment of meningitis caused by gram-negative enteric organisms.
Beneficial effects of x-irradiation on recovery of lesioned mammalian central nervous tissue.
Neuropathological changes in transgenic mice carrying copies of a transcriptionally activated Mos protooncogene [published erratum appears in Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A 1991 May 1;88(9):4060]
Structural alterations of nerve during cuff compression.
Cervical muscle myoelectric response to acute experimental sternocleidomastoid pain.
The neurologic workup in patients with cervical spine disorders.
Prognosticating study for cervical myelopathy using evoked spinal cord potentials.
Gunshot wounds to the cervical spine.
Natural history of progressive ischemic stroke in a population treated with heparin
Coagulation-fibrinolysis abnormalities in acute and chronic phases of cerebral thrombosis and embolism.
Diagnostic significance of flow separation within the carotid bifurcation demonstrated by digital subtraction angiography.
Cerebral blood flow and oxygen metabolism in patients with vascular dementia of the Binswanger type.
Denervation in hemiplegic muscles.
Rupture of atheromatous plaque as a cause of thrombotic occlusion of stenotic internal carotid artery.
Sensory ataxic hemiparesis in thalamic hemorrhage.
Pontine supranuclear facial palsy.
Syncope of unknown origin: clinical, noninvasive, and electrophysiologic determinants of arrhythmia induction and symptom recurrence during long-term follow-up.
An open trial of high-dosage antioxidants in early Parkinson's disease.
Lumbar puncture frequency and cerebrospinal fluid analysis in the neonate.
Cat-scratch disease. Acute encephalopathy and other neurologic manifestations.
Four chromosomal breakpoints and four new probes mark out a 10-cM region encompassing the fragile-X locus (FRAXA).
Identification of a highly polymorphic microsatellite VNTR within the argininosuccinate synthetase locus: exclusion of the dystonia gene on 9q32-34 as the cause of dopa-responsive dystonia in a large kindred.
A family study of Gilles de la Tourette syndrome.
Chromosome 15 uniparental disomy is not frequent in Angelman syndrome.
Pearson syndrome and mitochondrial encephalomyopathy in a patient with a deletion of mtDNA.
Surgical management of oculomotor nerve palsy
Neuropsychological deficits in fetal alcohol syndrome and fetal alcohol effects.
New approaches to research on the long-term consequences of prenatal exposure to alcohol.
Thymoma: results of 241 operated cases
Tracheoesophageal anastomosis for intractable aspiration pneumonia.
Acute rheumatic fever in West Virginia. Not just a disease of children.
Treatment of flexor tenosynovitis of the hand ('trigger finger') with corticosteroids. A prospective study of the response to local injection.
Spontaneous electromyographic potentials in chronic spinal cord injured patients: relation to spasticity and length of nerve.
Multimodality evoked potential testing in acute mild closed head injury.
Orthostatic hypotension after spinal cord injury: treatment with fludrocortisone and ergotamine.
Silent myocardial ischemia during rehabilitation for cerebrovascular disease.
Neuromuscular function in polio survivors at one-year follow-up [published erratum appears in Arch Phys Med Rehabil 1991 Mar;72(3):213]
Open depressed skull fracture missed on computed tomography: a case report.
Vertebrobasilar occlusion following minor trauma in an 8-year-old boy.
Cat-scratch disease: an unusual cause of combative behavior.
Sudden cervical pain: spontaneous cervical epidural hematoma.
Differential reading recovery in patients with severe to moderate closed head injury.
Motor-evoked potentials reflect spinal cord function in post-traumatic syringomyelia.
Spasticity in spinal cord injured persons: quantitative effects of baclofen and placebo treatments.
Spinal nerve stimulation in the diagnosis of lumbosacral radiculopathy.
Spinal anaesthesia in day-care surgery with a 26-gauge needle.
Unconsciousness associated with midazolam and erythromycin.
A study of cyproheptadine in the treatment of metastatic carcinoid tumor and the malignant carcinoid syndrome.
Radiosurgery of acoustic neurinomas.
Ontogenetic features of audiogenic seizure susceptibility induced in immature rats by noise.
Effects of discontinuation of phenytoin, carbamazepine, and valproate on concomitant antiepileptic medication.
Cognitive function and time-of-day variation in serum carbamazepine concentration in epileptic patients treated with monotherapy.
Immunologic aspects of carbamazepine treatment in epileptic patients.
Carbamazepine-induced antinuclear antibodies and systemic lupus erythematosus-like syndrome.
Effect of felbamate on plasma levels of carbamazepine and its metabolites.
Double-blind, placebo-controlled, cross-over trial of progabide as add-on therapy in epileptic patients.
Development and reversal of contingent inefficacy and tolerance to the anticonvulsant effects of carbamazepine.
Kindling susceptibility and genetic seizure predisposition in inbred mice.
Changes of hippocampal glucose utilization subsequent to amygdaloid-kindled generalized seizures.
Panic disorder in seizure patients: a diagnostic pitfall.
Effect of epilepsy and sleep deprivation on the rate of benign epileptiform transients of sleep.
Dreams and epilepsy.
Epilepsy with continuous spike-waves during slow sleep and its treatment.
Postnatal epilepsy after EEG-confirmed neonatal seizures.
Photosensitive epilepsies and photoconvulsive responses in Arabs.
Sexual behavior of a sample of females with epilepsy.
Attitudes of major employers toward the employment of people with epilepsy: a 30-year study.
Antiepileptic drug monitoring at the epilepsy clinic: a prospective evaluation.
Effects of lactulose and lactitol on protein digestion and metabolism in conventional and germ free animal models: relevance of the results to their use in the treatment of portosystemic encephalopathy.
Posterior transfer of the adductors in children who have cerebral palsy. A long-term study.
Deformities of the hip in adults who have sickle-cell disease and had avascular necrosis in childhood. A natural history of fifty-two patients.
The relation of pain to depression among institutionalized aged.
Is gastric acid responsible for the pain in patients with essential dyspepsia?
Oestrogen and progesterone receptors in acoustic neuroma.
Uses and complications of uvulopalatopharyngoplasty.
Use of EMLA cream as an analgesic in the management of painful otitis externa.
Ulcerative colitis and giant cell arteritis associated with sensorineural deafness
The frequency, causes and timing of death within 30 days of a first stroke: the Oxfordshire Community Stroke Project.
The natural history of non-arteritic anterior ischaemic optic neuropathy.
Syndromes of transient amnesia: towards a classification. A study of 153 cases.
Effect of nicardipine on somatosensory evoked potentials in patients with acute cerebral infarction.
Platelet monoamine oxidase B activity in parkinsonian patients.
Changes in the basal dendrites of cortical pyramidal cells from alcoholic patients--a quantitative Golgi study.
Temporal movement control in patients with Parkinson's disease.
Specificity of affective and autonomic symptoms of depression in Parkinson's disease.
Neurophysiological observations on corticospinal projections to the upper limb in subjects with Rett syndrome.
Motor units in incomplete spinal cord injury: electrical activity, contractile properties and the effects of biofeedback.
Visual evoked potential monitoring of optic nerve function during surgery.
Determination of ventricular fluid outflow resistance in patients with ventriculomegaly.
Neuropsychological profile linked to low dopamine: in Alzheimer's disease, major depression, and Parkinson's disease.
A case of amnesia after excision of the septum pellucidum.
Stroke rehabilitation: Australian patient profile and functional outcome.
Status of cochlear implantation in children. American Academy of Otolaryngology-Head and Neck Surgery Subcommittee on Cochlear implants.
Asymmetric growth of the lateral cerebral ventricle in infants with posthemorrhagic ventricular dilation.
Phenotypic variability in glutaric aciduria type I: Report of fourteen cases in five Canadian Indian kindreds.
The management of mid-face fractures with intracranial injury.
Multipiece tire rim injuries.
Multicenter trial of L-carnitine in maintenance hemodialysis patients. II. Clinical and biochemical effects.
Leukocyte alkaline phosphatase score in patients with cerebrovascular disease and in patients with primary and metastatic brain tumors.
Coronary bypass surgery: is the operation different today?
Feasibility of reversing benzodiazepine tolerance with flumazenil
Haemorrhagic shock encephalopathy and sudden infant death
The electrodiagnostic findings in polyneuropathies associated with IgM monoclonal gammopathies.
Carpal tunnel syndrome: correlations between pressure measurement and intraoperative electrophysiological nerve study.
Vector short-latency somatosensory-evoked potentials after median nerve stimulation.
Sick building syndrome.
Complications of lateral C1-2 puncture myelography.
Clinical value of magnetic resonance imaging for cervical myelopathy.
Motion analysis of the cervical spine in athetoid cerebral palsy. Extension-flexion motion.
Pathomechanism, pathogenesis, and results of treatment in cervical spondylotic myelopathy caused by dynamic canal stenosis.
Problems and solutions of pedicle screw plate fixation of lumbar spine.
Postoperative lumbar spinal instability occurring or progressing secondary to laminectomy.
Germ cell tumor of testis in a patient with von Hippel-Lindau disease.
The painful shoulder: Part I. Extrinsic disorders.
Utility of upright tilt-table testing in the evaluation and management of syncope of unknown origin
Diagnostic evaluation of syncope
Antiepileptic medication in pregnancy: late effects on the children's central nervous system development.
Tables for estimation of individual risks of fetal neural tube and ventral wall defects, incorporating prior probability, maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein levels, and ultrasonographic examination results.
Relationship of laparoscopic findings to self-report of pelvic pain.
Acute tolerance in morphine analgesia: continuous infusion and single injection in rats.
Effect of systemic medetomidine, an alpha 2 adrenoceptor agonist, on experimental pain in humans.
Snoring and sleep architecture.
Anton's syndrome in a patient with posttraumatic optic neuropathy and bifrontal contusions.
Pupil-sparing oculomotor nerve palsy due to midbrain infarction.
Initial therapy of patients with Wilson's disease with tetrathiomolybdate.
The influence of dialysate sodium and variable ultrafiltration on fluid balance during hemodialysis.
Cognitive and behavioural impairment among elderly people in institutions providing different levels of care.
Physiologic and psychobehavioral research in oncology.
Evolution of energy expenditure and nitrogen excretion in severe head-injured patients.
Noninvasive cerebral optical spectroscopy for monitoring cerebral oxygen delivery and hemodynamics.
Methodology of head-up tilt testing in patients with unexplained syncope
Lack of prognostic value of syncope in patients with Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome
Superiority of transesophageal echocardiography in detecting cardiac source of embolism in patients with cerebral ischemia of uncertain etiology.
Clonotypic analysis of anti-acetylcholine receptor antibodies from experimental autoimmune myasthenia gravis-sensitive Lewis rats and experimental autoimmune myasthenia gravis-resistant Wistar Furth rats.
Elevated expression of the genes for transforming growth factor-beta 1 and type VI collagen in diffuse fasciitis associated with the eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Carbamazepine overdose: a prospective study of serum levels and toxicity.
Long-term follow-up of patients operated on for recurrent carotid stenosis.
Angiographic localization of spinal cord blood supply and its relationship to postoperative paraplegia.
A prospective randomized study of cerebrospinal fluid drainage to prevent paraplegia after high-risk surgery on the thoracoabdominal aorta.
Mesenteric blood flow in patients with diabetic neuropathy.
Driving and epilepsy. A review and reappraisal
Elderly men with histories of heavy drinking: correlates and consequences.
Diagnostic utility of lower extremity radiographs of young children with gait disturbance.
Individual differences in children's response to pain: role of temperament and parental characteristics.
Methsuximide for intractable childhood seizures.
Ehrlichiosis in children.
Sucrose as an analgesic for newborn infants.
Infantile systemic hyalinosis: newly recognized disorder of collagen?
Neuroleptic malignant syndrome: life-threatening complication of neuroleptic treatment in adolescents with affective disorder.
Cerebral infarction: early detection by means of contrast-enhanced cerebral arteries at MR imaging.
Cerebral venography with MR.
Marked cerebrospinal fluid void: indicator of successful shunt in patients with suspected normal-pressure hydrocephalus.
Characterization of "peak E," a novel amino acid associated with eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Functional outcome measures in stroke rehabilitation.
Activation of coagulation in acute cardioembolic stroke.
Platelet volume, aggregation, and adenosine triphosphate release in cerebral thrombosis.
The role of neutrophils and platelets in a rabbit model of thromboembolic stroke.
Attenuated neuropathology by nilvadipine after middle cerebral artery occlusion in rats.
Hypertension, cigarette smoking, and the decline in stroke incidence in eastern Finland.
A novel treatment for ischemic intracranial hypertension in cats.
Cerebral infarction in patients with nephrotic syndrome.
Recurrent transient ischemic attacks and stroke in association with an internal carotid artery web
Neuroendocrine carcinoma of the ampulla of vater. A case of absence of somatostatin in a vasoactive intestinal polypeptide-, bombesin-, and cholecystokinin-producing tumor.
The bone marrow in human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)-related disease. Morphology and clinical correlation.
Persistence and remission of depressive symptoms in late life.
Olfactory identification deficits in HIV infection.
Cerebral palsy: why we must plan for survival.
Low-level lead exposure in the prenatal and early preschool periods: language development.
Amebic meningoencephalitis in a patient with AIDS caused by a newly recognized opportunistic pathogen. Leptomyxid ameba.
Glossopharyngeal neuralgia associated with cardiac syncope: long term treatment with permanent pacing and carbamazepine.
Salmeterol in nocturnal asthma: a double blind, placebo controlled trial of a long acting inhaled beta 2 agonist
Health care screening for people with mental handicap living in the community
Levels of the human hepatocyte growth factor in serum of patients with various liver diseases determined by an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.
Drug induced refractory headache--clinical features and management.
Acetylsalicylic acid vs. metoprolol in migraine prophylaxis--a double-blind cross-over study.
The VER as a diagnostic marker for childhood abdominal migraine.
99mTc HM-PAO SPECT in pediatric migraine.
Cerebral vein thrombosis shown by MRI.
The cluster diathesis.
Cluster headache: the effect of low oxygen saturation
Relaxation training in school classes does not reduce headache complaints.
Recurrent tension headache in adolescents treated with self-help relaxation training and a muscle relaxant drug.
Pharmacokinetics of tiaprofenic acid after oral administration in fasting patients during and between migraine attacks.
Treatment of status migrainosus: the American experience.
Sumatriptan in acute migraine: pharmacology and review of world experience.
Atelectasis affects the rate of arterial desaturation during obstructive apnea.
Paratope- and framework-related cross-reactive idiotopes on anti-acetylcholine receptor antibodies.
Randomized comparison of ceftriaxone and cefotaxime in Lyme neuroborreliosis.
Ataxia in myxoedema: a neurophysiological reassessment.
Skin and epidural recording of spinal somatosensory evoked potentials following median nerve stimulation: correlation between the absence of spinal N13 and impaired pain sense.
The development of infratentorial atrophy in patients with idiopathic cerebellar ataxia of late onset: a CT study.
Impairment of vertical motion detection and downgaze palsy due to rostral midbrain infarction.
Fasciculations due to verapamil in a patient with neuropathy.
Epirubicin at two dose levels with prednisolone as treatment for advanced breast cancer: the results of a randomized trial.
Cerebral palsy and rhizotomy. A 3-year follow-up evaluation with gait analysis.
Acute subdural hematoma: morbidity, mortality, and operative timing.
Endoscopic ventricular fenestration using a "saline torch".
Intracranial arachnoid cysts in children. A comparison of the effects of fenestration and shunting.
An epithelial cyst in the cerebellopontine angle. Case report.
Spontaneous decompression of syringomyelia: magnetic resonance imaging findings. Case report.
Familial hemifacial spasm associated with arterial compression of the facial nerve. Case report.
Accessory arm--dysraphism or disparity? Case report.
Treatment of intractable arterial hemorrhage during stereotactic brain biopsy with thrombin. Report of three patients.
Carbon monoxide-induced delayed amnesia, delayed neuronal death and change in acetylcholine concentration in mice.
Meta-analysis of sulfasalazine in ankylosing spondylitis.
A self-administered hand symptom diagram for the diagnosis and epidemiologic study of carpal tunnel syndrome.
L-tryptophan induced eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome associated with L-tryptophan use.
Microangiopathy in the eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
An eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome associated with an L-tryptophan containing product.
Eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome in association with L-tryptophan ingestion.
L-tryptophan associated eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Acute urinary retention secondary to Herpes simplex meningitis.
Motor neuron disease (amyotrophic lateral sclerosis).
Tourette syndrome and other tic disorders. Diagnosis, pathophysiology, and treatment.
Predictors of morbidity and mortality in neonates with herpes simplex virus infections. The National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Collaborative Antiviral Study Group.
Pretreatment neuropsychological status and associated factors in children with primary brain tumors.
Brain retractor edema during induced hypotension: the effect of the rate of return of blood pressure.
Effects of repeated temporary clipping of the middle cerebral artery on pial arterial diameter, regional cerebral blood flow, and brain structure in cats.
Cerebral infarction and release of platelet thromboxane after subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Effect of hydrocephalus on prostaglandins and thromboxane B2 in ventricular cerebrospinal fluid.
Observations on the pathophysiology of Nelson's syndrome: a report of three cases.
Occult, bilateral anterior sacral and intrasacral meningeal and perineurial cysts: case report and review of the literature.
Neurinoma in the cavernous sinus: report of two cases.
"Moustache" appearance in craniopharyngiomas: unique magnetic resonance imaging and computed tomographic findings of perifocal edema.
Delayed hearing loss after neurovascular decompression.
Immunoglobulins from animal models of motor neuron disease and from human amyotrophic lateral sclerosis patients passively transfer physiological abnormalities to the neuromuscular junction.
Vascularized full-thickness parietal bone grafts in maxillofacial reconstruction: the role of the galea and superficial temporal vessels.
Botulinum A toxin for the treatment of adult-onset spasmodic torticollis.
Reflex sympathetic dystrophy syndrome: consensus report of an ad hoc committee of the American Association for Hand Surgery on the definition of reflex sympathetic dystrophy syndrome.
Clinical features and natural history of von Hippel-Lindau disease
Spontaneous neurodegeneration in transgenic mice with mutant prion protein
T cell receptor peptide therapy triggers autoregulation of experimental encephalomyelitis.
Lyme disease: neurologic and ophthalmic manifestations.
Automatic rifle injuries: suicide by eight bullets. Report of an unusual case and a literature review.
Multidisciplinary baseline assessment of homosexual men with and without human immunodeficiency virus infection. III. Neurologic and neuropsychological findings.
Effect of vaginal delivery on the pelvic floor: a 5-year follow-up.
Extradural haematoma in the Irish Republic: an analysis of 82 cases with emphasis on 'delay'.
Congenital demyelinating motor and sensory neuropathy with focally folded myelin sheaths.
Symptomatic and essential rhythmic palatal myoclonus.
Experiential phenomena of temporal lobe epilepsy. Facts and hypotheses.
The role of diencephalic pathology in human memory disorder. Evidence from a penetrating paranasal brain injury.
Single unit analysis of the human ventral thalamic nuclear group. Activity correlated with movement.
Striatonigral degeneration. A clinicopathological study.
Spongiform encephalopathy transmitted experimentally from Creutzfeldt-Jakob and familial Gerstmann-Straussler-Scheinker diseases.
Percutaneous balloon pulmonary valvuloplasty in sickle cell anemia: a case report.
The TURP syndrome.
High incidence of cardiopulmonary complications associated with implantation of adrenal medullary tissue into the caudate nucleus in patients with advanced neurologic disease.
Hemodynamic effects of nasal CPAP examined by Doppler echocardiography.
Respiratory muscle strength and control of ventilation in patients with neuromuscular disease.
Effect of ethanol on the efficacy of nasal continuous positive airway pressure as a treatment for obstructive sleep apnea.
Acute pulmonary embolism triggered by the act of defecation.
Effect of cardiac output reduction on rate of desaturation in obstructive apnea.
Hyperprolactinemia increases and hypoprolactinemia decreases tyrosine hydroxylase messenger ribonucleic acid levels in the arcuate nuclei, but not the substantia nigra or zona incerta.
Humor, aggression, and aging.
Pathogenesis and pathophysiology of meningitis.
Approach to diagnosis of meningitis. Cerebrospinal fluid evaluation.
The acute aseptic meningitis syndrome.
Bacterial meningitis in neonates and children.
Bacterial meningitis in adults.
General principles of therapy of pyogenic meningitis.
Meningitis in the neurosurgical patient.
Spirochetal infection of the central nervous system.
Persistent neutrophilic meningitis.
Tuberculous meningitis.
Fungal meningitis.
Meningitis due to protozoa and helminths.
Chronic pain in primary care. Identification and management of psychosocial factors.
A multicentre follow-up study of 1152 patients with myasthenia gravis in Italy.
Motor dysfunction in HIV-infected patients without clinically detectable central-nervous deficit.
Oculo-bulbar myasthenic symptoms as the sole sign of tumour involving or compressing the brain stem.
Fluctuations of interictal brain imaging in repeated 123I-IMP SPECT scans in an epileptic patient.
Primary intracerebral sarcoma in childhood: case report with electron-microscope study.
Aberrant regeneration in a case of syringobulbia: selective co-activation of abducens and facial nerves during saccades.
Familial eating epilepsy.
Transient ischaemic attacks and small-vessel disease. Dutch TIA Study Group
The role of conditioning and verbal expectancy in the placebo response.
The robustness of an empirically derived taxonomy of chronic pain patients.
Litigation and employment status: effects on patients with chronic pain.
Profiles of opioid analgesia in humans after intravenous bolus administration: alfentanil, fentanyl and morphine compared on experimental pain.
Neglected factors in chronic pain treatment outcome studies--referral patterns, failure to enter treatment, and attrition.
Heart rate changes as an autonomic component of the pain response.
Opiates suppress carrageenan-induced edema and hyperthermia at doses that inhibit hyperalgesia.
Effects of the calcium antagonist nilvadipine on focal cerebral ischemia in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Glossopharyngeal schwannoma: review of five cases and the literature.
A single case of Huntington's disease simultaneously occurring with obstructive hydrocephalus.
Embolism of cerebral tissue: a cause of coagulopathy and cerebral infarction? Report of a case.
The painful shoulder: Part II. Intrinsic disorders and impingement syndrome.
The effect of quinidine and mexiletine on the adaptation of ventricular refractoriness to an increase in rate.
Why are autism and the fragile-X syndrome associated? Conceptual and methodological issues.
Progress in the search for genetic linkage with Tourette syndrome: an exclusion map covering more than 50% of the autosomal genome.
X-linked sideroblastic anemia and ataxia: linkage to phosphoglycerate kinase at Xq13.
Molecular genetic basis of maple syrup urine disease in a family with two defective alleles for branched chain acyltransferase and localization of the gene to human chromosome 1.
Tay-Sachs disease in Moroccan Jews: deletion of a phenylalanine in the alpha-subunit of beta-hexosaminidase.
Validation of a surveillance case definition of carpal tunnel syndrome
Propofol infusion for control of status epilepticus.
32-gauge spinal catheters through 26-gauge needles
Paraesthesia with lumbar epidural catheters. A comparison of air and saline in a loss-of-resistance technique.
Eosinophilic fasciitis associated with tryptophan ingestion. A manifestation of eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Supported employment: an alternative model for vocational rehabilitation of persons with severe neurologic, psychiatric, or physical disability.
Telephone use to elicit voice or speech in brain injured subjects.
The disabled driver: an unmet challenge.
Psychosocial, functional, and quality of life assessment of patients with posttraumatic fracture nonunion, chronic refractory osteomyelitis, and lower extremity amputation.
Costs of operating a supported work program for traumatically brain-injured individuals.
Reversible nerve conduction block in patients with polyneuropathy after ultrasound thermotherapy at therapeutic dosage.
Goal attainment scaling and outcome measurement in postacute brain injury rehabilitation.
Factors predicting satisfactory home care after stroke.
Visual illusions in a patient with lateral medullary syndrome.
A videofluoroscopy chair for the evaluation of dysphagia in patients with severe neuromotor disease.
Cotton-wool spots and retinal light sensitivity in diabetic retinopathy.
Traumatic retinal detachment.
Anisocoria in unilateral ophthalmic disease.
Long-term efficacy of primary laser trabeculoplasty.
Electrophysiology and colour perimetry in dominant infantile optic atrophy.
Local injection treatment of tennis elbow--hydrocortisone, triamcinolone and lignocaine compared.
Higher incidence of carpal tunnel syndrome in oophorectomized women.
Malignant glandular triton tumor.
Differentiation in embryonal neuroepithelial tumors of the central nervous system.
Effects of local reduction in pressure on distensibility and composition of cerebral arterioles.
Optimum results of the surgical treatment of carotid territory ischemia.
Advances in the treatment of complex cerebrovascular disorders by interventional neurovascular techniques.
Limits of brain tolerance to daily increments in serum sodium in chronically hyponatraemic rats treated with hypertonic saline or urea: advantages of urea.
Role of diabetologist in evaluating diabetic retinopathy.
Learning disabilities in epilepsy: neurophysiological aspects.
Education and epilepsy: assessment and remediation.
Antiepileptic drugs, cognitive function, and behavior in children: evidence from recent studies.
Computerized neuropsychological assessment of cognitive functioning in children with epilepsy.
Neuropsychological assessment of cognitive functioning in children with epilepsy.
Electroencephalographic parameters in assessing the cognitive function of children with epilepsy.
Discontinuation of antiepileptic drugs in children who have outgrown epilepsy: effects on cognitive function.
Cognitive deficits in children: adaptive behavior and treatment techniques.
Educational policies.
Neuropsychological aspects of learning disabilities in epilepsy.
MRI, CT, SPECT, PET: their use in diagnosing dementia.
Spinal instability secondary to metastatic cancer.
Surgical treatment of double major scoliosis. Improvement of the lumbar curve after fusion of the thoracic curve.
Tarsal tunnel syndrome. Causes and results of operative treatment.
Scaphoid malunion.
Internal fixation of femoral neck fractures. Two methods compared.
Intravenous administration of phosphorylated acid alpha-glucosidase leads to uptake of enzyme in heart and skeletal muscle of mice.
The timed "Up & Go": a test of basic functional mobility for frail elderly persons.
Mini-Mental State exam scores vary with education in blacks and whites.
Physician practices in the diagnosis of dementing disorders.
Postauricular cerebellar encephalocoele secondary to chronic suppurative otitis media and mastoid surgery.
Temporal bone findings in two cases of head injury.
Very high blood pressure in acute stroke.
Increased arterial adrenaline is related to pain in uncomplicated myocardial infarction.
Localization of technetium-99m-glucarate in zones of acute cerebral injury.
Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease in pituitary growth hormone recipients in the United States.
Meralgia paresthetica after coronary bypass surgery.
Pulse oximetry during apparent tonic-clonic seizures.
Comparison of continuous subcutaneous and intravenous hydromorphone infusions for management of cancer pain.
Neurofibromatosis type 2: report of a family and review of current evaluation and treatment.
Reversible myeloneuropathy of nitrous oxide abuse: serial electrophysiological studies.
Nerve-muscle involvement in a large family with mitochondrial cytopathy: electrophysiological studies.
Diagnostic and prognostic value of electrophysiologic tests in meralgia paresthetica.
Abnormal single motor unit behavior in the upper motor neuron syndrome.
Effects of short spaceflights on mechanical characteristics of rat muscles.
A placebo-controlled trial of maintenance therapy with fluconazole after treatment of cryptococcal meningitis in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. California Collaborative Treatment Group.
Young-onset Parkinson's disease: a clinical review.
The role of HTLV in HIV-1 neurologic disease.
Early development of levodopa-induced dyskinesias and response fluctuations in young-onset Parkinson's disease.
Patient perception of tics and other movement disorders.
Hashimoto's encephalopathy: a steroid-responsive disorder associated with high anti-thyroid antibody titers--report of 5 cases.
Essential tremor: clinical correlates in 350 patients.
Symptoms and disease associations in idiopathic intracranial hypertension (pseudotumor cerebri): a case-control study.
Lateral medullary infarction: prognosis in an unselected series.
Infarction in the anterior rostral cerebellum (the territory of the lateral branch of the superior cerebellar artery).
Myotonic heart disease: a clinical follow-up.
Epidermal nevus syndrome: a neurologic variant with hemimegalencephaly, gyral malformation, mental retardation, seizures, and facial hemihypertrophy.
Comparison of functional and structural brain disturbances in Wilson's disease.
Vascular abnormalities in epidermal nevus syndrome.
Percutaneous aspiration of brain tumor cysts via the Ommaya reservoir system.
Reciprocal inhibition between forearm muscles in spastic hemiplegia.
Interictal spiking during wakefulness and sleep and the localization of foci in temporal lobe epilepsy.
Phenytoin toxicity due to interaction with clobazam.
Eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome associated with ingestion of L-tryptophan: muscle biopsy findings in 4 patients.
Cerebrospinal fluid eicosanoid levels: endogenous PGD2 and LTC4 synthesis by antigen-presenting cells that migrate to the central nervous system.
Syphilitic meningomyelitis.
The "numb cheek-limp lower lid" syndrome.
Repetitive conservative surgery for recurrence of endometriosis.
Pyogenic spinal sepsis in adults.
Osteoblastoma of the spine. A review of 75 cases.
Hemibody irradiation in advanced prostatic carcinoma.
Use of intravenous stilbestrol diphosphate in patients with prostatic carcinoma refractory to conventional hormonal manipulation.
Combination of Anandron with orchiectomy in treatment of metastatic prostate cancer. Results of a double-blind study.
Granulocytic sarcoma presenting as an epidural mass with acute paraparesis in an aleukemic patient.
Prediction of free phenytoin levels based on [total phenytoin]/[albumin] ratios. Potential errors with hypoalbuminemia.
Endosalpingosis as a cause of chronic pelvic pain.
Effects of acute hypermagnesemia on the threshold for lidocaine-induced seizures in the rat.
Visual recovery in patients with optic neuritis and visual loss to no light perception.
Systemic amyloidosis in transgenic mice carrying the human mutant transthyretin (Met30) gene. Pathologic similarity to human familial amyloidotic polyneuropathy, type I.
Keratin subsets in spindle cell sarcomas. Keratins are widespread but synovial sarcoma contains a distinctive keratin polypeptide pattern and desmoplakins.
Substance abuse and cerebral blood flow.
Self-injurious behavior: a review of the behavior and biology of self-mutilation.
A critical appraisal of mitogen-induced lymphocyte proliferation in depressed patients.
Depressive symptoms following stroke.
The nature and course of olfactory deficits in Alzheimer's disease.
Nonfearful panic disorder in neurology patients validated by lactate challenge.
Ultrastructural evidence of a merocrine secretion in the human endolymphatic sac.
Organ procurement in patients with fatal head injuries. The fate of the potential donor.
Lipids, vascular disease, and dementia with advancing age. Epidemiologic considerations.
Giant cell arteritis. A case with unusual neurologic manifestations and a normal sedimentation rate.
P300 brain activity in seizure patients preceding temporal lobectomy.
Age at onset of Alzheimer's disease. Relation to language dysfunction.
The distribution of cerebral muscarinic acetylcholine receptors in vivo in patients with dementia. A controlled study with 123IQNB and single photon emission computed tomography.
Widespread functional effects of discrete thalamic infarction.
Spectral analysis of heart rate in diabetic autonomic neuropathy. A comparison with standard tests of autonomic function.
Alterations in brain phosphate metabolite concentrations in patients with human immunodeficiency virus infection.
The effect of sleep on the dyskinetic movements of Parkinson's disease, Gilles de la Tourette syndrome, Huntington's disease, and torsion dystonia.
Intravenous immunoglobulin treatment in patients with chronic inflammatory demyelinating polyneuropathy. Clinical and laboratory characteristics associated with improvement.
Posttraumatic torticollis.
An early description of slowly progressive aphasia.
Frontal impairment and hypoperfusion in neuroacanthocytosis.
Visual evoked potentials and visual prognosis following perinatal asphyxia.
Trial of brief intermittent neuroleptic prophylaxis for selected schizophrenic outpatients: clinical and social outcome at two years.
Prevalence of acute mountain sickness in the Swiss Alps.
Prognosis of Wilsonian chronic active hepatitis.
Hereditary internal anal sphincter myopathy causing proctalgia fugax and constipation. A newly identified condition.
Management of pseudarthrosis after arthrodesis of the spine for idiopathic scoliosis.
Valgus deformities of the feet and characteristics of gait in patients who have rheumatoid arthritis.
Reconstruction of the chronically insufficient anterior cruciate ligament with the central third of the patellar ligament.
The automatic implantable cardioverter-defibrillator: effect of patch polarity on defibrillation threshold.
Comparison of motor response to apomorphine and levodopa in Parkinson's disease.
Evaluation of vigabatrin as an add-on drug in the management of severe epilepsy.
Early-onset dementia and extrapyramidal disease: clinicopathological variant of Gerstmann-Straussler-Scheinker or Alzheimer's disease?
Diagnostic value of anti-neuronal antibodies for paraneoplastic disorders of the nervous system.
Diurnal differences in response to oral levodopa.
Vitamin B12 and folate concentrations in serum and cerebrospinal fluid of neurological patients with special reference to multiple sclerosis and dementia.
Clinical diagnosis of Binswanger's disease.
A simple method to improve the accuracy of non-invasive ultrasound in selecting TIA patients for cerebral angiography.
The accuracy of predictions about progress of patients on a stroke unit.
Spectral analysis of tremor: understanding the results.
Shy-Drager syndrome. Effect of fludrocortisone and L-threo-3,4-dihydroxyphenylserine on the blood pressure and regional cerebral blood flow.
Hydromyelic hydrocephalus. Correlation of hydromyelia with various stages of hydrocephalus in postshunt isolated compartments.
Functional outcomes following selective posterior rhizotomy in children with cerebral palsy.
Spontaneous neuronal hyperactivity in the medial and intralaminar thalamic nuclei of patients with deafferentation pain.
Radical intracapsular removal of acoustic neurinomas. Long-term follow-up review of 11 patients.
Radiation-induced optic neuropathy: a magnetic resonance imaging study.
Relationship between body and brain temperature in traumatically brain-injured rodents.
Tethered cord syndrome from a choristoma of mullerian origin. Case report.
Intradural chordoma of the tentorium cerebelli. Case report.
A vascular malformation mimicking an intracanalicular acoustic neurilemoma. Case report.
Anticonvulsant and behavioral effects of two novel competitive N-methyl-D-aspartic acid receptor antagonists, CGP 37849 and CGP 39551, in the kindling model of epilepsy. Comparison with MK-801 and carbamazepine.
Combined hemorrhagic shock and head injury: effects of hypertonic saline (7.5%) resuscitation.
Optimal escort for interhospital transport of pediatric emergencies.
Relative effects of brain and non-brain injuries on neuropsychological and psychosocial outcome.
Timing of osteosynthesis of major fractures in patients with severe brain injury.
Reflex sympathetic dystrophy after clavicle fracture: case report.
Rediscovering tactile agnosia.
Snow skiing for the physically disabled.
Traumatic intracranial aneurysms caused by missiles: their presentation and management.
Progressive coma after the transsphenoidal decompression of a pituitary adenoma with marked suprasellar extension: report of two cases.
Ectopic retinoblastoma within the 3rd ventricle: case report.
Monitoring of cortical blood flow during temporary arterial occlusion in aneurysm surgery by the thermal diffusion method.
The effect of continuous drainage of cerebrospinal fluid in patients with subarachnoid hemorrhage: a retrospective analysis of 108 patients.
Spinal cord stimulation: a contemporary series
Chronic headache associated with a functioning shunt: usefulness of pressure monitoring.
The transoral approach for the management of intradural lesions at the craniovertebral junction: review of 7 cases.
Improved access to lesions of the central skull base by mobilization of the zygoma: experience with 54 cases.
Diabetic amyotrophy without pain. A puzzling clinical picture.
Intracranial aneurysms: interventional neurovascular treatment with detachable balloons--results in 215 cases
Nerve root avulsion of birth palsy: comparison of myelography with CT myelography and somatosensory evoked potential.
Mapping the distribution of amobarbital sodium in the intracarotid Wada test by use of Tc-99m HMPAO with SPECT.
Osteonecrosis of the knee after arthroscopic surgery: diagnosis with MR imaging.
The prolonged burner syndrome.
Cauda equina syndrome after continuous spinal anesthesia.
Continuous postoperative regional analgesia by nerve sheath block for amputation surgery--a pilot study.
Intestinal permeability in patients with chronic urticaria-angioedema with and without arthralgia.
Effect of parenterally administered gold therapy on the course of adult rheumatoid arthritis
Lyme disease: recommendations for diagnosis and treatment
Developmental dyslexia in women: neuropathological findings in three patients.
Cerebrospinal fluid immune complexes in patients exposed to Borrelia burgdorferi: detection of Borrelia-specific and -nonspecific complexes.
Cerebellar and frontal hypometabolism in alcoholic cerebellar degeneration studied with positron emission tomography.
Normal proprioceptive trigeminal afferents in patients with Sjogren's syndrome and sensory neuronopathy.
Timing and topography of cerebral blood flow, aura, and headache during migraine attacks.
General assay for phosphoproteins in cerebrospinal fluid: a candidate marker for paraneoplastic cerebellar degeneration.
Ataxia and peripheral neuropathy: a benign variant of peroxisome dysgenesis.
OKT3 encephalopathy.
Orocaecal transit time in Duchenne muscular dystrophy.
Cardiac echinococcosis with fatal intracerebral embolism.
Temporal arteritis with normal erythrocyte sedimentation rates presenting as occipital neuralgia.
Risk monitoring of randomized trials in emergency medicine: experience of the Brain Resuscitation Clinical Trial II.
Early diagnosis and survival of ruptured abdominal aortic aneurysms.
Cerebral circulation and metabolism in patients with septic encephalopathy.
The effect of pH buffering on reducing the pain associated with subcutaneous infiltration of bupivicaine [published erratum appears in Am J Emerg Med 1991 Jul;9(4):410]
Evaluation of minor head trauma in children younger than two years.
New approaches in the rehabilitation of the traumatic high level quadriplegic.
Research in physical medicine and rehabilitation. XII. Measurement tools with application to brain injury.
Recovery time of independent function post-stroke.
A case of cerebrotendinous xanthomatosis. II: The sterol content of a cataractous lens.
Outcome of cataract surgery in central India: a longitudinal follow-up study.
Corneal sensitivity and correlations between decreased sensitivity and anterior segment pathology in ocular leprosy.
Flecked retina associated with ring 17 chromosome.
Ocular defects in infants of extremely low birth weight and low gestational age.
Magnetic resonance imaging of the head and spine: effective for the clinician or the patient?
Ventilatory function as a predictor of fatal stroke.
Availability of transplantable organs from brain stem dead donors in intensive care units.
Reinforcement of incontinent stools in the treatment of encopresis.
Relative validity of self-reported snoring as a symptom of sleep apnea in a sleep clinic population
Dacron-woven pacemaker pouch. Influence on long-term pacemaker mobility.
Sleepwalking precipitated by treatment of sleep apnea with nasal CPAP.
Potentially fatal asthma and syncope. A new variant of Munchausen's syndrome in sports medicine.
Natural killer cell activity in patients with liver cirrhosis relative to severity of liver damage.
Alzheimer's disease and related disorders in state mental hospitals: data from a nationwide survey.
Elevated intracranial pressure and computed tomography of the brain in fulminant hepatocellular failure.
Differences in the membrane interaction of scrapie amyloid precursor proteins in normal and scrapie- or Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease-infected brains.
Effect of indomethacin on the pathophysiology of experimental meningitis in rabbits.
Sudden death and sleeping history among Finnish men.
Long-term follow-up of the use of nonporous hydroxyapatite for augmentation of the alveolar ridge.
Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease from allogeneic dura: a review of risks and safety.
Clinical diagnostic considerations on cocaine abuse.
Medicare Peer Review Organization preprocedure review criteria. An analysis of criteria for three procedures
Neurobehavioral effects of phenytoin prophylaxis of posttraumatic seizures
Physical and pharmacologic restraint of nursing home patients with dementia. Impact of specialized units
Retrovirus-induced spongiform myeloencephalopathy in mice: regional distribution of infected target cells and neuronal loss occurring in the absence of viral expression in neurons.
Tumoral thrombosis of cerebral venous sinuses: preoperative diagnosis using magnetic resonance phase imaging.
Hydrocephalus: overdrainage by ventricular shunts. A review and recommendations.
Unusually late onset of cerebrospinal fluid rhinorrhea after head trauma.
Angiotropic intravascular large-cell lymphoma (malignant angioendotheliomatosis): report of a case and review of the literature.
Treatment of leptomeningeal carcinomatosis with continuous intraventricular infusion of recombinant interleukin-2.
Antivenom therapy in Russell's viper bite.
Midazolam-induced benzodiazepine withdrawal syndrome
Response to suxamethonium in a myasthenic patient during remission.
Non-drug related asystole associated with anaesthetic induction.
Modification of pain on injection of propofol--a comparison between lignocaine and procaine.
Flexion-extension views in the evaluation of cervical-spine injuries.
Lidocaine potentiation of cocaine toxicity.
Phenytoin administration by constant intravenous infusion: selective rates of administration.
Poisoning with equine phenylbutazone in a racetrack worker.
Multiple cranial nerve deficits after ethylene glycol poisoning.
Genetic cause of a juvenile form of Tay-Sachs disease in a Lebanese child.
Elevated alpha-tumor necrosis factor levels in spinal fluid from HIV-1-infected patients with central nervous system involvement.
Neuroanatomy of fragile X syndrome: the posterior fossa.
Visual dysfunction in Alzheimer's disease: relation to normal aging [published erratum appears in Ann Neurol 1991 Mar;29(3):271]
The functional anatomy of motor recovery after stroke in humans: a study with positron emission tomography.
Lymphoma, motor neuron diseases, and amyotrophic lateral sclerosis.
Nerve growth factor prevents toxic neuropathy in mice.
Localization of 3H-dihydroergotamine-binding sites in the cat central nervous system: relevance to migraine.
Acceleration of scrapie in trisomy 16----diploid aggregation chimeras.
Muscle biopsy for diagnosis of malignant hyperthermia susceptibility in two patients with severe exercise-induced myolysis.
Traumatic subarachnoid-pleural fistula in a child. A case report.
Total knee arthroplasty in patients after patellectomy.
Magnetic resonance imaging for ineffectual tarsal tunnel surgical treatment.
Neurologic status of spina bifida patients and the orthopedic surgeon.
Gait analysis in the treatment of the ambulatory child with cerebral palsy.
Impact of day care on dementia patients--costs, well-being and relatives' views.
A comparison of the efficacy and safety of pergolide and bromocriptine in the treatment of hyperprolactinemia.
Immunoassay of P2 protein in cerebrospinal fluid in neurological disorders.
The role of pain in the last year of life of older persons.
Mechanical ventilation in medical and neurological diseases: 11 years of experience.
Serum creatinine: an independent predictor of survival after stroke.
Familial hypobetalipoproteinaemia complicated by cerebellar ataxia and steatocystoma multiplex.
Patterns of neuropsychological impairment after severe blunt head injury.
Fibromyalgia in human immunodeficiency virus infection.
An objective score to predict upper tract deterioration in myelodysplasia.
Thigh muscle function after partial tear of the medial ligament compartment of the knee.
Magnetic resonance imaging in the preoperative evaluation of cervical radiculopathy.
Intracranial hypertension in relation to memory functioning during the first year after severe head injury.
Localization of stereotactic targets by microrecordings of thalamic somatosensory evoked potentials.
Definition of the role of contemporary surgical management in cisternal and parenchymatous cysticercosis cerebri.
Cerebrospinal fluid flow dynamics in children with external ventricular drains.
The influence of the calcium antagonist nimodipine and induced hypertension on the behavior of the cerebral pial arteries, the blood-brain barrier, cerebral edema, and cerebral infarction in cats with one-hour occlusion of the middle cerebral artery.
Kenneth McKenzie, Harvey Cushing, and the early neurosurgical treatment of spasmodic torticollis.
Isolated trigeminal sensory loss secondary to a distal anterior inferior cerebellar artery aneurysm: case report.
Iatrogenic saphenous neuralgia: successful therapy with neuroma resection.
Spinal man after declaration of brain death
Reversible hearing loss from cerebellopontine angle tumors.
Adult peripheral neuroepithelioma in Meckel's cave.
A comparison of midazolam with and without nalbuphine for intravenous sedation.
Presentation and management of an acute caffeine overdose.
Selective myectomy for postparetic facial synkinesis.
Intrapalatine resection (IPR) in the treatment of sleep apnea and snoring.
Radiographic manifestations of anomalies of the brain.
Genetic mapping of new DNA probes at Xq27 defines a strategy for DNA studies in the fragile X syndrome.
mtDNA depletion with variable tissue expression: a novel genetic abnormality in mitochondrial diseases.
Deficiency of complex III of the mitochondrial respiratory chain in a patient with facioscapulohumeral disease.
Intermediate hyperhomocysteinemia resulting from compound heterozygosity of methylenetetrahydrofolate reductase mutations.
Distribution of three alpha-chain beta-hexosaminidase A mutations among Tay-Sachs carriers.
Nasal midline masses in infants and children. Dermoids, encephaloceles, and gliomas.
Postcardiotomy mechanical circulatory support in the elderly.
Muscle rehabilitation in impaired elderly nursing home residents.
Evaluation of treatment protocols on minimal to moderate spasticity in multiple sclerosis.
Anemia after traumatic spinal cord injury.
Sexual changes in hemiparetic patients.
Recurrent thoracic outlet syndrome after first rib resection.
Wrist flexion as an adjunct to the diagnosis of carpal tunnel syndrome.
Detecting lower motor neuron dysfunction of the pharynx and larynx with electromyography.
Neurobehavioral effects of phenytoin, carbamazepine, and valproic acid: implications for use in traumatic brain injury.
A cellist with arm pain: thermal asymmetry in scalenus anticus syndrome.
Candida pyelonephritis complicating traumatic C5 quadriplegia: diagnosis and management.
Spinal accessory nerve palsy: an unusual complication of coronary artery bypass
Ratio of immunochemically determined amniotic fluid acetylcholinesterase to butyrylcholinesterase in the differential diagnosis of fetal abnormalities.
The neck-eye reflex in patients with reduced vestibular and optokinetic function.
Neuroacanthocytosis. A clinical, haematological and pathological study of 19 cases.
Idiopathic intracranial hypertension. A prospective study of 50 patients.
Dual task performance and processing resources in normal subjects and patients with Parkinson's disease.
Reversed lateralization of cognitive functions in right handers. Exceptions to classical aphasiology.
Short-term memory and sentence comprehension. An investigation of a patient with crossed aphasia.
Task-dependent variations in parkinsonian motor impairments.
Effects of anticonvulsant treatment and low levels of folate and thiamine on amine metabolites in cerebrospinal fluid.
The stroke syndrome of striatocapsular infarction.
Human olfactory discrimination after unilateral frontal or temporal lobectomy.
Sequencing in Parkinson's disease. Abnormalities in programming and controlling movement.
Clinical features and treatment of obstructive sleep apnea.
Diagnosis of obstructive sleep apnea.
Pain control in the ambulatory elderly.
The role of methanethiol in the pathogenesis of hepatic encephalopathy.
Effects of antihypertensive therapy on mechanics of cerebral arterioles in rats.
Plasticity of integrin expression by nerve-derived connective tissue cells. Human Schwann cells, perineurial cells, and fibroblasts express markedly different patterns of beta 1 integrins during nerve development, neoplasia, and in vitro.
Differential diagnosis of mut and cbl methylmalonic aciduria by DNA-mediated gene transfer in primary fibroblasts.
Trichothiodystrophy with chronic neutropenia and mild mental retardation.
Modifying the translabyrinthine approach to preserve hearing during acoustic tumour surgery.
Unusual presentation of squamous cell carcinoma of the middle ear and mastoid.
Radiation-induced cranial nerve palsy: hypoglossal nerve and vocal cord palsies.
Life events and difficulties preceding stroke.
Transient ischaemic attacks in young patients: a thromboembolic or migrainous manifestation? A 10 year follow up study of 46 patients.
Idiopathic and symptomatic trigeminal pain.
Clinical features and associations of 560 cases of motor neuron disease.
Progressive degeneration of the right temporal lobe studied with positron emission tomography.
Vigabatrin: rational treatment for chronic epilepsy.
Correlation between essential tremor and migraine headache.
Cyclosporin-associated akinetic mutism and extrapyramidal syndrome after liver transplantation.
Cauda equina syndrome associated with multiple lumbar arachnoid cysts in ankylosing spondylitis: improvement following surgical therapy.
Grading white matter lesions on CT and MRI: a simple scale.
Hypothalamic obesity due to hydrocephalus caused by aqueductal stenosis.
The community hospital-based stroke programs in North Carolina, Oregon and New York--V. Stroke diagnosis: factors influencing the diagnostic evaluation of patients following acute stroke.
Bone metastases: pathophysiology and management policy.
High risk of recurrent stroke after discontinuance of five to twelve years of transfusion therapy in patients with sickle cell disease.
Fundoplication and gastrostomy in familial dysautonomia.
Is it correct to correct? Developmental milestones in 555 "normal" preterm infants compared with term infants.
Relationships of somatic symptoms to behavioral and emotional risk in young adolescents.
Influence of preservation or perfusion of intraoperatively identified spinal cord blood supply on spinal motor evoked potentials and paraplegia after aortic surgery.
Limitations of electroencephalographic monitoring in the detection of cerebral ischemia accompanying carotid endarterectomy.
Intrathecal baclofen for spasticity in cerebral palsy
No confirmation of visual evoked potential diagnostic test for migraine.
Intracranial pressure in African children with cerebral malaria
Intracranial complications of paranasal sinusitis: a combined institutional review.
Polyglucosan body disease.
AAEM case report #1: ulnar neuropathy at the elbow.
Abnormal pattern detected in fragile-X patients by pulsed-field gel electrophoresis.
Lexical organization of nouns and verbs in the brain.
The nature of opioid responsiveness and its implications for neuropathic pain: new hypotheses derived from studies of opioid infusions.
Chronic musculoskeletal pain and depressive symptoms in the general population. An analysis of the 1st National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey data.
Codeine plus paracetamol versus paracetamol in longer-term treatment of chronic pain due to osteoarthritis of the hip. A randomised, double-blind, multi-centre study.
Pain 'memories' in phantom limbs: review and clinical observations.
Assessment of the components of observed chronic pain behavior: the Checklist for Interpersonal Pain Behavior (CHIP).
Diphtheria-tetanus-pertussis vaccine and serious neurologic illness: an updated review of the epidemiologic evidence.
Can clinical judgment detect children with speech-language problems?
Location of port-wine stains and the likelihood of ophthalmic and/or central nervous system complications.
Hypoglycemia, hypotonia, and cardiomyopathy: the evolving clinical picture of long-chain acyl-CoA dehydrogenase deficiency.
Tilt test for diagnosis of unexplained syncope in pediatric patients.
Pain management in the orthopedic patient.
Help for the hurting elderly. Safe use of drugs to relieve pain.
Chronic pain--assessment of orthopedic physical therapists' knowledge and attitudes.
Movement analysis--an aid to early diagnosis of cerebral palsy.
Implications of a dynamical systems approach to understanding infant kicking behavior.
Cognitive strategies during coincident timing tasks.
Measurement and treatment in cerebral palsy: an argument for a new approach.
Dorsal rhizotomy for children with cerebral palsy: support for concepts of motor control.
Spinal cord injury after subclavian flap aortoplasty. An experimental study in piglets.
Long-term medical consequences of incest, rape, and molestation.
Scalp pilomatrix carcinoma as an extra-axial mass.
Cerebral falciparum malaria mimicking thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura.
Management of arginine monohydrochloride extravasation in the forearm.
Cerebellar degeneration and Meige's syndrome.
Profound papilledema due to cryptococcal meningitis in acquired immunodeficiency syndrome: successful treatment with fluconazole.
Acute oculogyric crisis after administration of prochlorperazine.
Experience with surgical treatment of Takayasu's disease.
Interstitial cystitis: successful management by increasing urinary voiding intervals.
Methamphetamine. Stimulant of the 1990s?
Outpatient management of schizophrenia.
Neuromuscular disease of the gastrointestinal tract.
Murine retroviral neurovirulence correlates with an enhanced ability ofvirus to infect selectively, replicate in, and activate resident microglial cells [published erratum appears in Am J Pathol 1991 May;138(5):1058]
Secondary deposition of beta amyloid within extracellular neurofibrillary tangles in Alzheimer-type dementia.
Effect of thiopental on neurologic outcome following coronary artery bypass grafting
Recovery profile after desflurane-nitrous oxide versus isoflurane-nitrous oxide in outpatients.
The induction dose of propofol in infants 1-6 months of age and in children 10-16 years of age.
The dynamic flexometer: an instrument for the objective evaluation of spasticity.
Role of hypoxic drive in regulation of postapneic ventilation during sleep in patients with obstructive sleep apnea.
Bronchial mucus hypersecretion in acute quadriplegia. Macromolecular yields and glycoconjugate composition.
Rate of oxyhemoglobin desaturation in obstructive versus nonobstructive apnea.
A prognostic system for transient ischemia or minor stroke.
A new syndrome of congenital hypoparathyroidism, severe growth failure, and dysmorphic features.
Outcome among surviving very low birthweight infants: a meta-analysis.
Causes and consequences of blood pressure alterations in obstructive sleep apnea.
Refractory hypoglycemia secondary to topical salicylate intoxication.
Central nervous system magnesium deficiency.
Risk of dementia in first-degree relatives of patients with Alzheimer's disease and related disorders.
Assessing the severity of dementia. Patient and caregiver.
Antecedent medical diseases in patients with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis. A population-based case-controlled study in Rochester, Minn, 1925 through 1987.
Environmental risk factors in siblings with Parkinson's disease.
Heterogeneity in spasmodic dysphonia. Neurologic and voice findings.
Lateral deviation of the eyes on forced lid closure in patients with cerebral lesions.
Seizure disorders in Down syndrome.
Lymphomatous polyneuropathy. Biopsy of clinically involved nerve and successful treatment.
Horner's syndrome from hypothalamic infarction.
Results of N-methyl-D-aspartate antagonists in perinatal cerebral asphyxia therapy.
Prognostic significance of multimodality evoked response testing in high-risk newborns.
Clinical analyses and short-term prognoses of neonates with subependymal cysts.
Value of plasmapheresis in hepatic encephalopathy.
Wide cavum septum pellucidum: a marker of disturbed brain development.
Partial cytochrome b deficiency and generalized dystonia.
Respiratory muscle involvement in nemaline myopathy.
A pilot study of suramin in the treatment of metastatic renal cell carcinoma.
High-dose cisplatin plus dacarbazine in the treatment of metastatic melanoma.
Meningeal carcinomatosis in breast cancer. Prognostic factors and influence of treatment.
Central nervous system involvement in patients with facial palsy due to borrelial infection.
CV 205-502--effectiveness, tolerability, and safety over 24-month study.
Limb-body wall complex with complete absence of external genitalia after in vitro fertilization.
Portacaval shunt versus endoscopic sclerotherapy in the elective treatment of variceal hemorrhage.
Fulminant hepatitis B: induction by hepatitis B virus mutants defective in the precore region and incapable of encoding e antigen.
Overt hepatic encephalopathy precipitated by zinc deficiency.
Clinical differentiation of fulminant Wilsonian hepatitis from other causes of hepatic failure.
Noninvasive trigeminal evoked potentials: normative data and application to neuralgia patients.
Common headaches: type, duration, frequency and implications.
Naproxen sodium in menstrual migraine prophylaxis: a double-blind placebo controlled study.
A comparative study of naproxen sodium, pizotyline and placebo in migraine prophylaxis.
Cervicogenic headache: diagnostic criteria.
Angiographic changes suggestive of vasospasm in migraine complicated by stroke.
The headache-specific locus of control scale: adaptation to recurrent headaches.
Headaches in dementia.
Quantitation of skin vasomotor control in normal subjects and in diabetic patients with autonomic neuropathy.
Immunological differentiation between neuroborreliosis and multiple sclerosis.
Magnetic resonance imaging in motor neuron disease.
Unilateral asterixis.
Further notes on Munchausen's syndrome: a case report of a change from acute abdominal to neurological type.
Miller-Fisher syndrome and pontine abnormalities on MRI: a case report.
Clinical, radiographic, and pathological features of symptomatic Rathke's cleft cysts.
Stereotactic radiosurgery of meningiomas.
Language function following anterior temporal lobectomy.
Seizure outcome from anterior and complete corpus callosotomy.
The standardized assessment of argyrophilic nucleolar organizer regions in meningeal tumors.
Intracranial pressure and cerebrospinal fluid outflow conductance in healthy subjects.
Shunt nephritis. Case report.
Magnetoencephalographic localization of interictal spike sources. Case report.
Optimal wound closure after tethered cord correction. Technical note.
Significance of magnetic resonance imaging in acute head injury.
The value of intubating and paralyzing patients with suspected head injury in the emergency department.
Seizure-associated speech arrest in elderly patients
Uniparental paternal disomy in Angelman's syndrome.
Indwelling epidural catheters for pain control in gynecologic cancer patients.
Serial neurobehavioral assessments in preterm infants.
Multiple representations of pain in human cerebral cortex.
Experimental nerve root compression. A model of acute, graded compression of the porcine cauda equina and an analysis of neural and vascular anatomy.
Spinal cord injuries. Clinical, functional, and emotional status.
Penetrating craniocerebral trauma.
Missed injuries. The trauma surgeon's nemesis.
Stroke recurrence within 2 years after ischemic infarction.
Chronic blood hyperviscosity in subjects with acute stroke, transient ischemic attack, and risk factors for stroke.
Mortality in acute stroke with atrial fibrillation. The Italian Acute Stroke Study Group.
Clinical-computed tomographic correlations of lacunar infarction in the Stroke Data Bank.
Treatment of acute hydrocephalus after subarachnoid hemorrhage with serial lumbar puncture.
Brain magnetic resonance imaging and neuropsychologic evaluation of patients with idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
Prognostic significance of conjugate eye deviation in stroke patients.
Atrial fibrillation after stroke in the elderly.
An improved photochemical model of embolic cerebral infarction in rats.
Clentiazem reduces infarct size in rabbit middle cerebral artery occlusion.
Basilar artery occlusion in rats.
Quantitative proton magnetic resonance imaging in focal cerebral ischemia in rat brain.
Turner's syndrome, fibromuscular dysplasia, and stroke.
Racial differences in cerebrovascular disease hospitalizations.
One-year outcome after cerebral infarction in whites, blacks, and Hispanics.
Probability of stroke: a risk profile from the Framingham Study.
Postischemic (S)-emopamil therapy ameliorates focal ischemic brain injury in rats.
Thrombosis in a congenitally bifurcated superior sagittal sinus.
Stroke after heavy marijuana smoking.
Adipsic hypernatremia in two sisters.
Maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein screening: further consideration of low-volume testing.
Outpatient sedation: an essential addition to gynecologic care for persons with mental retardation.
A randomized, controlled trial of the use of music during laceration repair.
Glucagon: prehospital therapy for hypoglycemia.
Thrombolytic therapy for noncoronary diseases.
Rehabilitation in spinal cord disorders. 2. Anatomy, pathogenesis, and research for neurologic recovery.
Rehabilitation in brain disorders. 1. Basic sciences.
Rehabilitation in brain disorders. 2. Clinical manifestations and medical issues.
Rehabilitation in brain disorders. 3. Intervention strategies.
Rehabilitation in brain disorders. 4. Specific disorders.
Pupillary and electroretinographic abnormalities in a family with neuronal intranuclear hyaline inclusion disease.
Symptoms of Raynaud's syndrome in patients with fibromyalgia. A study utilizing the Nielsen test, digital photoplethysmography, and measurements of platelet alpha 2-adrenergic receptors.
In vivo leukocyte migration in arthritis.
Observation of cerebrospinal fluid flow with echo-planar magnetic resonance imaging.
Fetal choroid plexus cysts: a prospective study and review of the literature.
Artificial urinary sphincter insertion in congenital neuropathic bladder.
The contribution of median nerve SEPs in the functional assessment of the cervical spinal cord in syringomyelia. A study of 24 patients.
Congenital mirror movements. Abnormal organization of motor pathways in two patients.
Perception and action in 'visual form agnosia'.
Modulation of the stretch reflex during volitional sinusoidal tracking in Parkinson's disease.
Microsaccadic flutter.
Development of language in six hemispherectomized patients.
Paraesthesiae and tetany induced by voluntary hyperventilation. Increased excitability of human cutaneous and motor axons.
Cells secreting anti-MAG antibody occur in cerebrospinal fluid and bone marrow in patients with polyneuropathy associated with M component.
Subcutaneous lisuride infusion in Parkinson's disease. Response to chronic administration in 34 patients.
Multiple representations contribute to body knowledge processing. Evidence from a case of autotopagnosia.
Meningeal involvement in Bence Jones multiple myeloma.
Effects of age on seizure susceptibility in genetically epilepsy-prone rats (GEPR-9s).
Noradrenergic abnormalities in the central nervous system of seizure-naive genetically epilepsy-prone rats.
Interictal spikes and hippocampal somatostatin levels in temporal lobe epilepsy.
Correlation of abnormalities of interictal n-isopropyl-p-iodoamphetamine single-photon emission tomography with focus of seizure onset in complex partial seizure disorders.

